I have made this several times for my family and the love it. I have a recipe with a homemade crust that is delicious, but it does take some time to put together. I love this recipe because the crust is premade and easy for a quick homemade dinner!
Week 1 of de-cluttering the playroom pit went well. I tossed out all sorts of broken, loud and sad toys. I took about half away, and they are in their storage bins in a room Connor does not have access to. And a bunch are in the pile of things to be sold. Gotta nail down a garage sale date now.
Ok ok, I ate one too.....
I guess you could say I got started in the wedding world as a bridesmaid in my sister's wedding when I was 16. It was the first time I ever looked through a Martha Stewart Weddings magazine, and I totally fell in love.
Who says there are no good roles for women over 40? There are three ladies who have reached that milestone (Glenn Close, Meryl Streep, Viola Davis) and are defiantly the front-runners in this category, and they might be joined by a fourth (Tilda Swinton in We Need to Talk About Kevin). Beyond Close/Streep/Davis, this category could go in a number of different directions. I’m betting on the presence of a young newcomer à la Jennifer Lawrence last year, likely either Elizabeth Olsen or Felicity Jones (Like Crazy). Kirsten Dunst (Melancholia), Rooney Mara (The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo), and Charlize Theron (Young Adult) must also have their due considerations.
This has included a small focus on I/my, you/your, he/his and she/her differences, which don’t exist in Mandarin – one pronoun is used for both functions in each case.
Another part of the ultra setting would bе the Direct-X compatible sound card that haѕ motherboard capabilities in delivering а high quality sound. These cards arе nоrmаllу internal оr external аnd cаn be attached tо a surround sound system for а ultra gaming experience.An active Broadband Internet connection іѕ neсеѕsarу fоr normal and ultra settings.
My heart sank and tears flowed throughout the entire show. I was reminded how precious life is, how fast it can be taken. With our new list(see and my previous post) and this hitting home. I am going to try a LOT harder to be a better mother, wife, friend and person.
After all the CTMH and Bella years...I've finally gotten to meet my dear friend Lori Scott! Such a sweetheart and so glad I got to finally meet her! I had no idea she was coming, so this was such a sweet and wonderful surprise for me!
This is a need to this month's Kit. Filled with Chipboard Pieces by Pink Paislee, Kanban diecuts and Paper, Bo Bunny Die Cut Journals, ClearSnaps Mannequin set of 3 and 18" of beaded wire chain - Embellishment Add on 19.99
We had so many beautiful entries for our Things with Wings challenge and it wasn't easy picking a winner - the range of styles and designs was amazing, from classic Christmas images and traditional colours to the modern and funky. I kept going back to this one, though ... I think it's the eyes which did it for me!
--I'm flying to Argentina for a week, on my own, to learn to dance the Argentine tango. ... I haven't danced a choreographed step since 1982Information: Tango has nothing to do with choreography. If you're dancing choreography, you may be in a stage show about tango, but you're not dancing tango. Unfortunately, readers won't learn that in this article. Also: a week?
Taking a leaf from the new wave of North American carriers who have already introduced ‘Premium Economy’ to their fleet to cross the big divide from Economy and Business, a struggling Air Canada is currently in RnD to develop and introduce a ‘Premium Economy’ to their fleet. This will be a major draw to Air Canada’s long-haul network, and will create an attractive new premium product for one stop connections into America for intercontinental travellers.
The Story of Variety with Michael Grade is wonderful stuff for anyone interested in showbiz and bizarre acts. Ken Dodd talks of the old Variety theatres having “a smell of oranges and cigars”. In Ashton-under-Lyme, the performers had to hang their shoes up in the dressing rooms because of the rats.
Hello all! Welcome to the Make It Crafty Blog Hop! You should have hopped here from Julie's blog. If you are just joining us and would like to start at the beginning, please go to Alyce's blog! We are all very excited today, not only are we celebrating a new release, but we are also celebrating a new illustrator Marina! She has a whimsical style and is going to bring lots of gorgeous backgrounds and characters, starting today with the "Under The Sea" collection!
Annette
Today’s Menu:
Santorum: Obama bailed out
Now, if I have to explain one more time what led the judge to this decision, I will jump screaming from the roof of the Hotel de Ville. Yes, I do know why the JdP named a temporary syndic. No, I don't want to go into it. No one understands it when I explain it, but let me just say: there was nothing we could do about this, and if someone tells me I should have challenged it I will stab them in the thigh with a spoon. Ok, good.
I had yet another run-in with ground bees this past week--I was going to plant some of the ornamental grasses. I didn't realize they were nesting in one of the containers and when I picked the grass out of the bucket I got stung. I dropped the grass and ran into the house, not realizing that they were in hot pursuit. My shirt was FULL of them-I ended up with at least 20 stings, 5 of them quite bad. I got my revenge later in the week, though. I went out in the dark and filled a barrel with water and threw the grass in while they slept. It was only 41 out, so I think that even if it had been light out, they wouldn't have been too active...but better safe than sorry!
We were given this dress code...
The restaurant and sundowner bar also overlook both the beach and swimming pool: sit sipping a cocktail while a gentle sea breeze dances on your sunkissed skin.
— ”Patterns of Conflict”, Chart 143)
"The flapper is the most precious piece of femininity in the world. And I know. For I have seen the Paris flappers, the London floppers and the Genoan fluppers, to say nothing of the Berlin type. The young American girl is the same sweet, pure-minded girl that her grandmother was. She has self-assurance, though. That is the product of the times." Miss Lucy Fox, of the cast of "Sonny"
Hey there! How is everyone? Our summer vacation has come to an end which means the kids are back in school. For me, that means a bit of adjusting and a little sadness. I really miss my kids during the day when they head back to school. We spend so much time together during the summer and I enjoy it so much that I really dislike the beginning of another school year.
But in saying that the only person I bought for was myself.. I came home with a cupcake holder made from old records, at the time I thought it was amazing but I later realised how silly it really is. Not to worry though, the markets are coming around again on the 25th of May so i’ll be able to pick up a proper one made from actual plates. Or maybe i’ll visit their website here.
“In proportion as nature has endowed Austin over all other Texas cities, causing it to be selected as the capital of the state, so also can Austin justly boast of her superiority over any other city in the south in that this city now possesses a magnificent hotel building, whose appointments would be an ornament to New York, St. Louis, or San Francisco, being the peer of any hotels in those cities.”
When I finally understood French well enough to understand muttering, I realized that what they were actually saying is that they didn’t know that much about it, but were familiar with the wines their parents grew up with, or that a friend recommended, or that they stumbled across. Wine is everywhere here (almost literally—just about every region of France has vineyards), so it’s not too difficult to absorb information if you have any interest at all. But while there are lots of people who know a lot about wine, there are even more who don’t, which is very reassuring to an outsider from a relatively wine-challenged country. I guess over the past 8 years I’ve absorbed a bit of The Knowledge, at least enough to be able to tell if a bottle has turned or not. But I would have never dared to think that I knew more than the moms from the park. Is it that wine-tasting is a male activity and they hadn’t ever needed to develop the skill? Or was it simply that they were bored with the whole wine thing, the way Italians might be about pasta, or the Dutch about tulips?
You're a guitarist, but listening to your demo songs there are also other instruments. Is it all you or have other musicians been involved too?
Writing a rough outline of how you want the scenes to unfold was really helpful. It gave the script structure that I wouldn’t have expected otherwise. While regular prose can just flow easily, script-writing isn’t that easy
The girl standing beside him nearly dropped my coffee when she heard this.
I recognize God as being the “author” of all of the earth. We grow vegetables and try to eat healthy, because my body is God’s temple, not my temple. I’m now a label reader and try to avoid body products that contain harmful chemicals. I think recycling items into other useful objects is fun, thrifty, and wise— not because I’m trying to save the earth. I won’t be referring to the weather patterns as “Mother Nature”; instead, you may hear me call it ”Father God”. Father God sent the rain, the snow, the storms, the hurricanes–not Mother Nature. We don’t “upset” Mother Nature, Mother Nature does not get mad at us. I think wind power and solar power and conserving electricity is a great idea. I do believe in respecting our earth’s resources, because of who the resource giver is.
What is troubling is the US media’s willingness to similarly tow the party line, but in the absence of any of the coercive measures, such as the state censorship, that the Russian press endures. There have been no William Dunbars on CNN, despite the fact that every report I’ve seen on the channel yesterday had been framed as “Russian invasion”, with endless clips of Saakashvili alleging Russian crimes etc, in a loop of totally pro-Georgian coverage. Georgia is a key US ally, the 3rd largest troop contingent in Iraq, and occupies a strategic, oil rich zone.
Back in 2007, a few people helped me make a few blocks. I don't know how long it will take me to make all these blocks by myself! But I will try.
Well, today will be a little different. When Dail stopped by the store last night, I asked him to get only Nick's lunches. There is very little food in the house at all. I will be limited in what and how much I can eat today. I have no way to go out to get food. I know the cravings will start but there will be no way to give in to them. I have set myself up to have a good eating day no matter what else happens. I have eggs, Canadian Bacon, Cheese, diet bread, deli ham, soymilk, and protein powder. I can't do much damage with that. These are not foods that inspire cravings or overeating. The test will come tonight when Dail gets off and I tell him what to bring home for dinner. I'm hoping that by then the worst of the hunger pains will be gone or satisfied. I need to get used to eating less food again. That means eating smaller amounts of more filling foods like dense proteins. I'm going to start the day with a protein shake and go from there.
Lamar has nothing close to this strong a case against Casey. He has no confession, no cause of death and no indication of premeditation. Evidence consists of Casey’s mysterious and indifferent behavior, her compulsive lying, a piece of fairly common duct tape and iffy evidence that there once was a body in the trunk of the abandoned family Pontiac.
Moon, the Mod whippet looked very embarrassed!
Pretty nice. Probably one of the heaviest lagers I've felt, it's similar to a dopplebock in feel. But it's a stout in the taste. Pretty strong coffee flavor in this one, especially in the aftertaste, which is very nice.
Despite these hardships Virginia Hensley remained dedicated to her pursuit of a singing career, in which she received the steadfast support of her mother. After gaining exposure through several local talent contests she was invited to join the orchestra at the York Inn in 1948, followed later in the year by an opportunity to audition for the Grand Ole Opry (an opportunity that initially amounted to nothing due to her status as a minor). It wasn’t until 1952 that things started to fall into place for the singer: it was at this time that, after landing a job at the Brunswick Moose Hall, she first adopted the stage name Patsy. Early the next year her marriage to Gerald Cline provided the other half of the name by which the world would come to know her. A record contract was secured in 1954, but unfortunately it was with a complete parasite named Bill McCall. A series of ineffectual singles ensued before at last the song Walking After Midnight (1957) provided the breakthrough she needed. A performance of it earned her a victory on The Arthur Godfrey Talent Show and the subsequent single release climbed high into the charts.
"I don't think I can explain this to you in a way you can understand," their father said softly. He stood up, almost knocking his chair over in the process. He gripped the edge of the table, and Sam noticed his knuckles were white. "All I can do is show you. I can take you there tonight."
The problem with the media reports from South Africa is that while some of the facts are mentioned – these are always overwhelmed by the ANC-propaganda. The propagandists will say that ‘South Africa still needs to emancipate itself from tribalism’. There was however an overwhelming body of evidence that these xenophobic attacks were well organised by high-level ANC-officials… and while people were being ‘arrested’ in front of the news media - they also were released into their communities almost at once.
After a very busy term she just wanted to stay in her room and play with her horses and who can blame her? I felt a bit the same myself.
With continuing police brutality happening in Oakland Anonymous has decided to strike back at city officials anyway that they can. We can thank them again for making it harder for tyrants to operate. I applaud Anonymous for fighting for the peoples rights.
It’s humbling to know that my ‘fans’ if you like are growing more and more each day and I have them to thank for helping me get so far already, their support is invaluable to me!
Dress: Smoking Lily
Not only did I find the perfect decal for the bathroom but there is literally one for every room in the house! The prices are very affordable and shipping is super fast. I was able to put my decal up very easily because it came with clear instructions. My bathroom has rough walls and decal was able to stick to the texture and looks like a professional job. I am so pleased with how the simplistic design really makes the bathroom pop and gives it a "pulled together" look. I cannot wait to add more decal to other areas of the home-such a simple fix that changes the whole look & feel of the room!
And yet.
See this link for versions in Czech, German, Spanish, Finnish, French, Italian, Dutch/Belgian, Polish, Brazilian Portuguese, Russian, Simplified Chinese, Traditional Chinese
I sprinkled baking soda on the bottom of a small tub and filled three cups with vinegar and food-coloring. Handing A an eye dropper, I set her loose to experiment with "painting" the baking soda with the vinegar. (Growing a Jeweled Rose used spray bottles, but the eye dropper helped draw out the activity and was great for fine motor control.)
- Some of us wake up in middle of night to see if we have mentions in Twitter
I hope that by showing interest in going into it in more depth after class we can talk more about it in class. I know that it's not just a tranny-captivating topic; gender/sexual biology and the psychology associated with stuff n' things is one of those subjects that's interesting to a lot of peeps and can be rambled on about for all eternity and beyond.
Seriously, who does this? If there are ghosts what in the hell is the point in trying to piss them off. Someone’s dead grandmother is just floating along and Zak Bagans comes out of nowhere, shirt off, just calling them out like some professional wrestler. These ghosts must be so surprised and confused as to what is going on.
(*You can leave out the flax if you want. If you do, you may not end up having to add extra honey.)
you’ve made available to partake of Your
see coz
"The last, Master?"
"What is there to eat in this house?" Sam asked.
“An orange is nothing like human skin,” Justin says. Still, he smiles at me before I go and I think: victory.
I did spare you from my makeupless face, so be grateful!
And I know, deeply I know, God did not intend for us to fail, and He did not delight in our defamation of His art, but…
1 cup Green Beans
(as I only got home from travelling on 23rd December)
Ramachandran et al. speculate that TK's experiences derive from increased connectivity between brain regions involve in vision (V4), face processing (FFA), and emotion (insula and amygdala). It would certainly be interesting to know whether this is supported by brain imaging.
I finally managed to finish my LSNED book this week. I've been starting to gather bits for preparing my 'Journal your Christmas' book, and thought I ought to get September's project wrapped up before I started the next one. Here's the final pages:
On February 24, 2011, Ruby was loving all the attention she was getting from her Aunt Elizabeth when she came to visit us. She was also making a super funny face in the pictures. Our little Archer was just a tiny little bean in my belly at the time and was for the most part still a secret.
Beat eggs. Gradually add sugar, then milk, butter, salt and yeast.
Post edit:
4 cups cranberries
China National Nuclear Corp. said it’s in talks to buy a stake in uranium mines owned by Areva SA (AREVA) as the world’s biggest energy consumer prepares to resume approval of new reactor construction.
Well, I think she put it all in the lobby of Domaine Saint Clair and Saint Clair is turning in her grave right now.
Your debates, CNN? They were a mess. You fully embraced the stupidity of reality television shows, with asinine introductions of the GOP candidates that reminded viewers of the opening credits of "Survivor." And then you asked questions like, "Deep dish or thin crust?" Over the course of a long primary season, viewers gradually grew tired of watching the debates. But they especially grew tired of watching yours.
I took the request to Facebook last night, as many of you know, and at last count we had 5 men willing to participate. One person thought she could get more of her male friends to do it as well if we need to pad the numbers. We need 12 altogether, so I need seven more guys to step up to the plate and take off their shirts for the sake of art (and comedy). So, ladies, flutter your eyelashes, pop open a beer, promise him exotic sexual favors. My own chunk of man-flesh was asleep when I had this lightbulb moment last night, but I will be working on him soon. And I know we have some guy readers out there, so you're not off the hook either, Willy, Joey, and Gene!
Saurel-Cubizolles MJ, Blan K. Activité professionnelle et grossesse. Occupational activities and pregnancy. Physicians' opinions. J Gynecol Obst Biol Reprod (Paris) 1993; 22: 571-80.
In the end we are the only way for the actual completion of our goals.
We are closer to our unofficial daughter Alex and her family, my friend Britt from NC lives less than 1/2 hr from here, my cousin Nate and his family are 15 minutes away, I can get to my BFF Mary Ann in much less time, and of course, most importantly is that Jen, Jeremy and CHARLIE will be just 2 1/2 hrs from me by the end of the summer. We knew all that but yet we just wanted out.
1 tbsp of chopped nuts
Three-year-old Tiana had joined the conversation.
2 cups rice
Told ya it was the best money I ever spent!
I wandered into the first few chapters expecting a straight narrative, but found instead a meandering, tangential recollection by a sailor about how he decided to go whaling. I was quickly impatient with Ishmael’s tale and it took me more than the first hundred or so pages to really settle into a rhythm. As soon as I became comfortable with Melville’s prose, and understood better what he was doing with the novel, I began to enjoy it a great deal more, and even to regret the first many chapters as wasted on me.
So a couple of days pass and I receive an email from him telling me that whoever called to schedule his appointment told him the incentive was 100 dollars less than what I myself had told him. I told him "absolutely not. I'm sure I gave you the right amount, but let me just straighten this out for sure. No matter what you will get what was promised to you". He seemed ok with this. So I heard back from the person I was, working with who informed me that I was correct and it was the scheduler who made this error. I notified the man and told him I was sorry for the misunderstanding but of course he will get the correct incentive. Then he emails me again and tells me that the woman on the phone (the scheduler) sounded "creepy" (she definitely is not) and that I told him that we would pay him at the beginning of the study rather than the end when EVERYONE ELSE on earth gets paid. I told him that I feel bad if there was a misunderstanding but we pay at the end after it's complete. I suggested at least 3 times that we please speak over the phone. He told me he is at work and doesn't have time or the ability to speak with me by phone(yeah too busy sending nasty emails). I tried calling him twice but just got voicemail He then tells me his appointment is scheduled in two days from that time and he will ONLY participate if we pay him in the beginning as I had promised IN CASH otherwise no deal. This made me laugh my ass off. I realize he was under the impression that HIS opinions were so unique and valuable that we would suffer a terrible loss if we were unable to utilize them, so he felt he was giving us some kind of ultimatum. He sent email after email after email (nasty troll, email thug, internet bully, all courageous and brave by email. I know the type all too well). He then says "you expect ME to spend two hours meeting with you, try this product at my home and then meet with you AGAIN, all for 200 dollars???? (mind you ALL of this was explained to him in very specific detail and he never once expressed the slightest hesitation or reluctance. We had talked a fair amount of time and I gave him every chance to think about it before deciding to move ahead so really it was his decision and his alone so to ball ME out for making him do it is the argument only a child wold use (a bratty one). It felt very obvious to me that what he wanted me to do was to persuade him to stay on and do the study but honestly I did not need him at all. We were doing HIM a favor. Giving him money for a fairly easy task and one phone call would be all I'd ever need to find a replacement. But he was acting like a child, refused to pick up the phone or answer my calls, fired off a bunch of crappy emails accusing me/us of telling him the wrong incentive or somehow trying to cheat him or fuck with him somehow. And if I got busy with anything else at my office and my email response to him was delayed by a few minutes he'd send another saying "and since you don't even RESPOND to my emails" (all aghast) then Obviously you.....(fill in the blank). It was getting more and more tiresome and really all I wanted to do was cut this guy loose or better yet let HIM cut himself loose but he never once said "you know Melissa, I'm sorry its just too much time and on second thought not really worth it to me, OR "you know Melissa I gotta be honest that after I talked to that creepy woman I just felt uneasy about all of this so I'd like to opt out". Nope. This guy just wanted to stay in the ring and fight. Maybe he wanted more money (it seemed like it) or he just wanted to be a total scumbag but whatever he wanted he was in love with the idea that he could just continue harassing me, who was just trying to do my damn job, and never have to face me to say the nasty things he said safely behind his computer.
"The story is a melodrama, and the atmospheric set is richly stocked with a disturbing miscellany of stuffed monkeys and dusty clockwork toys. Personally, I don’t dismiss the Pavlovian power of such bric-a-brac: just show me a cracked porcelain doll, for example, and I’m already jumpy. .."
Becky gasped and spun from the bookshelf to find herself face to face with the lord of the manor. She stammered as she fished for an appropriate excuse. Truth be known, she should not have been traipsing about the house at this hour, let alone on a mission to borrow one of the library’s books. She would be dismissed before she’d even had a chance to begin.
What if we all just did one nice thing to cancel out the yucky? Everytime someone/thing (hi e-bay!) is a butthead or does a butthead thing we do something positive?When someone is rude, give your next waitress a little extra tip. Saleslady doesn't help; hold the door for someone when leaving the store.
to seeing TSA's signature blue uniforms at the airport, but now agents are hitting the interstates to fight terrorism with Visible Intermodal Prevention and Response (VIPR).
Images of broken light which dance before me like a million eyes
~KO
Update: I wrote this last year. I have recently written an article which explains how we can eliminate the threat of nuclear meltdowns.
Please note that the speculative realists don’t even agree about what is wrong with correlationism! For example, what Meillassoux hates about correlationism is its commitment to “finitude,” the notion that absolute knowledge of any sort is impossible. But he doesn’t mind the correlationist view that “we can’t think an X outside of thought without thinking it, and thereby we cannot escape the circle of thought.” (He simply wants to radicalize this predicament and extract absolute knowledge from it. Meillassoux is not a traditional realist; German Idealism is his true homeland, just as it is for Zizek and to a slightly lesser extent Badiou.)
Carried further, it means your book will not have a ranking on its product page for its Books categories.
On another note, Martha Steward happily danced around the red carpet in an awesomely kitschy Cleopatra-esque dress that had gold fringe hanging off the sleeves with gold pointy kitten heels and white panty hose. Now that’s a good thing.
Very true! I first realized that when I started to teach at a school that followed a more communicative approach (whatever that really means) instead of a ‘drill ‘em to death’ approach; the latter being roughly how I was taught.
But I think I'd like some company. Would anyone care to join me?!
Overall rating 8.5
And I'm just between trains
9. Patience IS a virtue
* Keith and I are getting along fabulously, like best friends. ++ It's really nice and it's great for Richie. He's really adjusting well. I'm thinking that the motorcycle and pocket rocket are going to cause friction though when it comes time to pay for it all.
So yes, Whedon does get the balance right. He does an exceptionally good job as director and writer of exploring not just the heroism of these characters, but their humanity as well. He follows the decades-old formula of many comic books--gather a bunch of heroes, have them hate each other at first, then forge their alliance in fire--and makes it seem fresh and exciting, merely because no other movie has gotten it so right before.
So Ironside goes on a joy ride with the train in which he tries, and fails miserably, to reach the hammy heights of the Kurgan from the last movie. He’s pretty silly, yeah, but you just can’t beat a big muscular bald guy sitting in a church and making faces at the preachers. Or a crazy after-dark ride with an old lady. But I digress – the main reason Ironside pretty much sucks is because after his joy ride, in which he kills pretty much every passenger of the train, he opens the door looking all frazzled like a cartoon character and says “Last stop?”
i’m not holding my breath that she may change her mind after cooling down. if she does, cool. if she doesn’t, also cool. we’ll both move on.
The Church and Guidance #1
Last month a judge caused fury in the Christian community when he ordered Bideford Council in Devon to stop holding prayers during official proceedings – after an atheist former councillor complained it disregarded non–believers.
Punchestown Champion Stayers’ Hurdle, 2007 Cleeve Hurdle), Penzance (2005 JCB Triumph Hurdle), Stromness (2002 Sefton Novices’ Hurdle), Spendid (2002 Long Distance Hurdle), Crystal D’Ainay (2004 Cleeve Hurdle), Walkon (2009 Matalan Anniversary 4-Y-O Hurdle), Nenuphar Collonges (2008 Albert Bartlett Novices’ Hurdle) and Medermit (2011 Scilly Isles Novices’ Chase). When Katchit won the 2008 Stan James Champion Hurdle, he was the first five-year-old to triumph in the championship race for 23 years. After a couple of quiet seasons King has had his string in very good form this season, bagging a number of black type successes with likes of Grumeti, Invictus, Smad Place, Batonnier, Raya Star, Medermit and Secret Edge. King and his wife Rachel were married in Antigua in 1998. They have a son, Henry, and a daughter, Georgia.
Remember, the Stamp of the Month is only $5 with a $50 purchase. If you don't have a consultant and would love to pick up this stamp set, click here.
Before going any further, let me just say that I have nothing but admiration for the skill exhibited there. Further, when it comes to adjusting the tone and colors, and correcting mistakes that the photographer made in setting up the photos, many of these photos needed retouching. The best reason for retouching a photograph is to make the photograph look like the scene looked like–or should have looked like–in real life with the natural eye. And this goes for the models as well. Poor lighting, make up, and photography can make the most beautiful woman look like a hag. In many cases, the original photographer should have done a better job.
Let's eat.
He remembers
I remember that the weight loss program I did before when I lost 100lbs had this rule (or at least I think that is the weight loss program I got that nugget from… there have been so many they all run together…) My intention for weighing myself monthly is prevent the emotional roller coasters I would experience (and have been) if I weighed weekly and daily. Hopefully this too will encourage me to rely more on how I feel and look to gauge the success of The Program rather than on a number. I will weigh myself on the first of every month.
Temple says:
What challenges did you face this week? What opportunities came your way?
It seems we are in a similar situation right now over response driving and officers engaged in pursuits.
And yet the mind is somehow different from the brain, or at least so it seems from the inside.
While you are visiting Kat's blog please look at the rest of her work. Like this card that is absolutely amazing, you just have to see her work in progress photos. Wow.
We did some figuring and calculating, we think we can make it next spring if we want to. We can have the house built (or be building it) and be ready to move next spring. Maybe wait until our 10-year-old finishes 6th grade. We are all ready to go and get on with our lives.
What I’d like to draw your attention to is the fact that when a wave moves horizontally along a rope, the particles in the rope do not move horizontally. If they did move horizontally, the rope would eventually break! In fact, they move up and down. What moves along the horizontal direction is the movement itself. If we want to consider the wave a thing, we have to concede that it is not made up of a specific set of particles. It is a process, and the particles are just the medium by which the process flows.
I did consider whether I should go on the school art gallery trip as I felt so crap, but Smallest LB's face was a perfect portrait of misery at the thought that I wouldn't be going with her. And I had promised her teacher. And I had made a fuss about the sculpture. So I went.
And its the place that Anjel keeps gettin busted
Quantity recommended per person per meal: 1 pound of fish.
He slowly raises his head and grins...
So the next time you find yourself in New Paltz, rock on over to Rock Da Pasta for a great meal. Or take a drive. It's definitely worth the trip. As the saying (sort of) goes, "If music be the food of love, ROCK ON!"
The lighthouse is operational and is used by ships approaching and entering the River Tyne along with South Shields Lighthouse, Herd Groyne and North Shields Lighthouses.
Wesdal’s warm voice breaks her out of her daze. He’s a tall, thick built man with soft amber eyes and weathered features, like old stone. He isn’t old, really, but all shamans get like that. Wrinkly and dry before their time. She stares up at him blankly a moment before the sharp part of her mind smacks her out of it again.
Picking up the phone anyway
Tea was introduced to Britain by way of Amsterdam, like many European countries. There were already coffee houses in the streets of London in early 1600s. However, the upper class British society was fascinated with the exoticism of tea, especially with the marriage of Catherine of Braganza of Portugal to Charles II. Since the price of tea was expensive and tea trade was very lucrative, the British decided to get it from China themselves. The British East India Company, the commercial arm of the British crown, started importing tea from Canton and that yielded tremendous profit. It was said that tea filled the empty ships on the way back to Britain after exporting fabics from India to China in the first leg. As one can see, it was in fact in the interest of Great Britain to promote tea to the British people, which explains one of the reason why tea is so ingrained in the British culture till this day.
Rachel Isadora’s signature style turns to the holiday season, and what a treat it is! Transporting the carol “The Twelve Days of Christmas” to Africa, Isadora’s reinterpretation is full of life and color. Each two-page spread is dedicated to a different tradition as related to the song, while small boxes at the bottom of the page feature miniatures of the previous parts of the song. Isadora’s joyous, collage-style illustrations are beautifully textured and full of bright patterns that will catch young readers’ eyes. I especially enjoyed the author’s brief note at the end, which discusses some of her inspiration found in her travels in Africa. What a great twist on a traditional carol that incorporates practices from other parts of the world!
Taken to the limits of height and minimal cross section, a 2012 nose will be an ugly proposition, the flat topped nose cone at 55cm meeting the front bulkhead at 62.6cm high. This footwell section of monocoque extending all the way back to the dash bulkhead.
Back then, when things with God seemed so clear…so simple. Now it’s full of confusion. I don’t know which road to take…
2 - Those Who Do Knot (5:30)
Today's project challenge is doing "Something New/Something inspiring"
I was like...whoa....hold the phone (literally)......a fabric store that all fabric is $1.99 per yard???.....and I don't know about it? .....
jumping back in
I think in life success comes on many different levels, monetary success is just one of them, there are many other ways to be successful in life. If you have a happy family and are a good father, this is also a measure of success, if you can help other people this is also a measure of success.
The Seattle Police Department insists it won't be using new remote controlled aircraft to spy on people, despite concerns raised by the ACLU.
If you have items you would like to donate them send to me . I will be posting on my blog and encouraging others to post as well.
Luckily we had a co-ordinate for our destination, plus inside information that one of the safari lodge's supply trucks had passed that way the same morning, so as our little virtual vehicle bravely tracked its way along the virgin blankness of its screen, we were reassured by the tyre tracks in the sand ahead, and I entered waypoints as we went along.
William Prusoff witnessed Nazi activities in New York City in the mid 1930s, including attacks on the shop of his father, and the marching of Pro-German activists on the streets with swastika and Nazi style antisemitic slogans. Bill fled with his family to Florida, he came back years later and was one of the most renowned pharmacologists in the US. Bill Prusoff was one of the leading figures behind YIISA, a sponsor from the very beginning. With a huge portion of humor and his always optimistic view on society, Bill told me and two friends about his life and experiences with antisemitism.
LESSON #3: Passions can be destinations, but are more frequently journeys. It’s an interesting point about passions that they are viewed very, VERY differently by children than they are by adults. A child is more apt to pursue a passion because it is fun, without a specific attachment to be successful at it. They don’t begin the pursuit of a passion with an understanding of its highs and lows, or what it could be, or certainly what it should be. But as adults, we often tend to start a passion with an expectation about what it will look like. For example, Kade periodically talks about building a time machine. His interest is in designing it, measuring, and cutting, and hammering – and sharing it with me. Generally, an adult wouldn’t even begin building a time machine because you “can’t” – and if they wanted to hammer, measure, and cut, it would be in pursuit of a specific end goal, like a shelf or a chair. In my pursuit of my “career” as a teacher, it clearly moved from the “destination” to the “journey.” I read more, I learned more, and I experienced more about what being a teacher would be like. I realized that it wasn’t the right time for me, and with the idea of teaching still gnawing at me a bit, I dropped the idea and went to work in Human Resources.
1. We know how creative Berleen is with her terrific tee-shirts and such, so how about you? Do you draw anything or perhaps your name in the sand when you go to the beach?
Seeing as Valentine's Day is approaching our theme this time is "All Loved Up"
7 ) RIBA – The Teddy Bear Robo-Nurse
10. Rock And Roll All Nite (KISS cover)
Lindt suggested using 7 cardamon pods but I find it so so faint so I actually added 2 tablespoons =) yeaps, thats way more but I like it.
Straining to hear her words, the princess moved closer still, the pain pricking the bottoms of her feet. Please, her sister begged, please keep father safe as he goes in place of Jun to fight for the emperor. Jun? the princess wrinkled her nose in confusion. A small blossom fell then, resting upon the princess’s shoulder, fragrant and sweet, its skin soft like that of a small child. The princess’s eyes widened. Jun! Her mother had lost her firstborn, a son, whose death had taken her father’s hope to the soil with him. So, this mandate for battle had caused her mother’s tears and her father’s vacant eyes. Without an elder son, her father would have to go to battle, and, the princess realized, die.
Well I loooove pink! It has been one of my favorite colors since I was a little girl! I also love to find unique colors to mix with good old black, white, or brown. I always have to be color-coordinated with my outfits for school!
“But now things have changed. There is a much bigger awareness of the need to act together … that is recognised and accepted by all European leaders.
And now onto the bribes, that whole baseball thing is filled with M&M's - I don't recommend leaving this out on your own counter as you might reward yourself for going potty all too often. That LARGE basket is filled with toys for poops - I went a little crazy at the dollar section and toy section at Target...but Jason gave himself a truck tonight for using the toilet so they will probably go fast.
"I like beige too." I told him, but I'm not sure he heard me. To my ears it sounded like a confession. It's not always cool to be so enamored of a seemingly spiceless color. Beige. I admit is definitely a favorite. I like to think of it in more mysterious terms these days. I don't think it's a boring color as much as mere camouflage. An easy way to go calmly unnoticed and just a little hidden. Sometimes a little understatement isn't such a bad thing. Beige is pretty diplomatic after all. Doesn't it get along with everything and find it easy to play straight man to the wild side at a moments notice?
side note: wouldn't it be great to have a fridge that just kept expanding to fit everything we needed to put in/on it? :)
-lionsault is blocked
Fruit (3): 3
Nå var stoffet blitt så pent at hun ble forfengelig og syntes at mange skulle kunne se henne. Dermed gikk hun til sin gode venn Janome symaskin, og spurte om han kunne hjelpe henne med å bli quiltet. Selvfølgelig, sa Janome.
The figure looms in the sky, moves forward towards you
In this paper, he equates traditional Christian denominations that believe that homosexuality a sin, with the infamous Fred Phelps. By the same token, I should equate his embracing of the homosexual "lifestyle" with the freak-show parades of San Fransisco.
“Has anyone ever done that?” I ask with intense curiosity.
5.) When I was a kid, my mom and I would often travel back and forth from Manila to Batangas. We would leave Batangas very early like 4am. To get out of our house in Batangas, we had to pass by the stone walls. It was dark but I tried my best to look at the cracks between the stones, vigilantly watching if a snake would come out of those cracks. Our house in batangas had really tall talahib grass, so it isn’t entirely impossible that there were a couple snakes in the area. Our cat once killed a baby snake under our bed. Several years after, I told my mom about this fear and she was really surprised. She said “I thought you were really brave because even if it was so dark and scary, but you didn’t say a thing.” I said “I didn’t say a thing because I was trying to be brave, and I was too busy watching out for the snakes.” I am not afraid of Batangas anymore.
Doug True, president of Erin Engineering and Research, a Walnut Creek, Calif., nuclear consulting firm, said Sarrack’s proposal “never got any traction” in the industry because many people disagreed with its merits.
I’d hoped, and was proven correct, that my son would mention this advice to all his schoolmates. Assuredly, he did.
Today's post on Spitalfield's Life shows a clutch of photographs of streets around Spitalfields, taken almost 100 years ago to the day (just after the Titanic had sunk) and how those places look today (including Frying Pan Alley).
I *bleep* the cobwebs on the hall
One of the gifts those who are dying experience is an enhanced ability to live in the present moment. Because the future does not exist for them, each moment is significant and every breath is precious. Many spiritual teachers have emphasized the importance of remaining in the present moment, for growth occurs only in the present. But this is an extremely difficult task because our minds are accustomed either to dwelling in the past, conjuring up old memories, or to projecting into the future, dreaming or worrying about possibilities.
Though I was inspired by their resilience and determination, the women also bore the marks of very difficult lives. They were extremely small – a result of malnourishment – and extremely poor. Those in urban areas lived in one- or two-room homes in concrete apartment structures with little more than a bed and a curtain for a door, while those in rural areas shared their small homes with their precious livestock. One urban family lived in a very small room in an apartment that didn’t hold much more than a bed – shared among seven family members. The youngest of the five children was badly scarred from surgery for a broken leg and would never walk properly again. Though most of the children wore school uniforms and were enrolled, I struggled to imagine where they studied or how long it would be before they would be pulled from school to help earn income for the family.
“So great were her dynamism and force that it was almost impossible to resist her… Not only her own people, but all America has been enriched and ennobled by her courageous, ebullient spirit.” The Washington Post
This would be a huge mistake.
The range, scale and expectations for a book differ greatly depending on how serious an author is about their craft of writing and how they perceive their own books. Some writer’s long term intentions may be to earn at least a living income from writing books and articles. Other writers may have 'fallen' into the craft and do not see beyond the printing and publication of their first book. Hence, the wishes, aspirations and needs of writers differ greatly. There was a time when an author handed over their book to a publisher and the two in tandem floated off down the river leaving the author almost stranded on the river bank as if they were saying goodbye to a teenager leaving the family household for good. Now, publishers expect an author to work actively on promoting their book and raising as much as possible their public profile as an author.
Well, I hope Spring has well & truly sprung wherever you are in the world and that the sun is shining - or at least trying! Don't you just love the fresh greens & pin-pricks of flowers dotted about of this time of year? Well, when I made this the weather was 'hopeful' & decidedly Spring-like, then of course we had the blazing sun of last week - & now I think I should have supplied this young girl with a snow-shovel!
brandonsfuturewife- you have an issue with security and likeability. you want us all to love you and if we do not you lash out at us. this roots from your abusive husband you have. he is a verbal abuser and you have smeared that all over these boards. my favorite part was when you were mad you got pregnant. it takes two honey. we all know if you had a boy the second time you would have become a poster child for depression. good thing you were granted a daughter from your oops.
She had the PICC line for 13 days. Ten of which she received her antibiotics. The doc didn't want to take it out because she wanted to make sure the infection was clear before it was taken out. So we went to get some labs done and after a 48 hour study we were instructed to have the PICC line taken out. The infection was gone. We were so relieved...but only for a brief time.
Rochita: Oh, I have to laugh reading what Aliette is writing because I had to think of one instance where I critted a work of someone I was in a workshop with and being told that my insight couldn’t be right because history and reference books said it was so. This was on crit about a story which makes use of Chinese culture. Now, I am no expert in Chinese culture, but I did have a number of extended family (this is a very Filipino concept) who were part of the Chinese community and what was written just didn’t compute with what I knew or what I had absorbed of it. I shut up at that point because my immersion was more tribal and I found myself doubting my own experience of the culture.
I mean, really, how many times can people who have never deployed explain to me how to re-ignite the home fires with my husband after a year-long deployment? Especially a month or two after he returns home? And don't get me started on the briefs put on by groups like the Department of Labor where the presenter is ill-prepared and doesn't even really know how to relate their material to veterans....something that always floors me about these things.
Hail to thee, thou Vespa, thou Prince among transporters!
That's not the shape, the shape of my heart
My sore toes were aching, my flobby floppy flabby bits were moving far too much, and for those who have children, you’ll know what I mean when I say my pelvic floor was not coping so well. But it was fun!
I have no idea why I didn't take any pictures of the pasta! Wow, I'm only 24 and starting to lose my marbles. hehe. Sorry, guess you'll just have to imagine it. =)
This one gives off a quick, hoppy smell in the glass and pours a light coffee color, sporting a cream colored head. The taste hints at licorice with a quick alcohol bite that’s a bit wine like. Mouth feel is medium thick and it finishes with a flavor of coffee and more hints of licorice.
There is so much information readily available today. The click of a mouse, and we have access to more websites, blogs, tutorials and videos than we ever have time to look through. How on earth can we use it to our advantage and not get overwhelmed? And besides that, how do we find the time to wade through all that info and actually retain information that is useful?
The best way to become a solid poker player and improve your bankroll is to make a deposit yourself. Yes you will be spending your own money and yes you have a chance to loose it. However you can look at it from another angle. Most poker players make their first deposit from $25 to $100 which is what you would probably pay for a night out therefore you can probably afford to make this investment into your poker game if you want to improve it. When you make your first deposit you will receive a deposit bonus, which, as time goes on, will keep topping up your bankroll. You will have access to all the poker room’s promotions available and set up for you, those have a tremendous money making a saving potential. You can decide which limits you want to play and when to withdraw your money. Most poker rooms offer their real money depositing players other incentives to play and maintain their bankroll often in a way of rakeback where you can get a portion of the money you made for the poker room back, usually about 33% paid weekly back into your account. But most importantly you will treat your investment seriously and the quality of your game will improve as you take time to learn the game, strategy and develop your skills. Therefore making your first deposit and receiving your First Deposit Bonus might turn out to be the best investment you made into your game on the way to become a profitable poker player.
Jonsi: No, it was cool. He's so nice to work with and a great guy in general. He mainly helped us with the recording process. He recorded us in the swimming pool and also our rehearsal space and then he mixed it in our attic in the house me and him share. He brought a lot of new arrangements to the songs and reconstructed some of the pieces that were all over the place. He helped us make sense of it all and also encouraged us to record more instruments, and for me to sing and write more lyrics. I guess you could say he played a big part in the making of the record.
He has provided me with a customized heart-changing. mind-renewing. life-altering. way of life that is easy to bear and light to carry. And there are no numbers to track.
Shooting at dawn and dusk has been the best advice I have read anywhere on the internet. Why? It’s the best time to get saturated colors because the sun is at its best lighting. Or so I have heard. Putting it to the test really makes you appreciate the advice you are given.
The Lo-Fi / Psych - Guitar Blow Outs:
Security is a major concern today even though this area has not seen the crime waves reported in other parts of Mexico. But the hotels take it seriously. At each of the resorts for the two couples in our van, a guard at the gate checked the guest list before allowing us through.
My brain often gets stuck when I’m sitting at my desk. I put it down partly to the easy distraction of email etc, because it’s all just a finger-twitch away, and twitching that finger to the “sign on” screen is so much easier than writing. But I’ve often felt that it’s more than that. Even before the email tyrant took over, I’d noticed that if I was stuck on a story, the worst plan was to sit at my desk: the only way was to go for a walk. And so out I’d go, and lo and behold, within minutes all my problems (well, the writing-related ones) were sorted.
Another fellow from a taprooom but this time one of the brewers from Numazu.
They got us our room, paid for a dinner, breakfast, and room service, and mini-bar snacks!!
On one such occasion, my son was extremely out of sorts. He had done all the things his heart desired and didn't know where to go next. It was the bajillionth and one time I had been asked about the Wii so I said to my son. I says...son, DO something. DO math, write a letter, copy out of a book, copy a poem, WRITE a poem. Just DO something.
Is clear.
Period 1
Appearance and Reality.
peach compote
St. Louis Cardinals - (Ike's Cards - Paid)
Despite the fact that probably my all-time favorite children’s book is The Very Hungry Caterpillar, I despise the way caterpillars’ bodies slink. Nevermind that they usually turn into delicate butterflies, which I love. I mean, nevermind that they’re the same darn creature in either form. It doesn’t matter. With their many pairs of legs fanning their long bodies out like a wave as they clamber across the sidewalk and up the trees, I can’t help but get the willies.
Here are a few options for doing so:
Me, I'm going to celebrate the good news and take on the bad news when it comes. CAMY was, with Joe "Crazy for Health" Califano's CASA, one of the most strident New Dry organizations, unconcerned with scientific rigor so long as the anti-alcohol message flooded the media. Ah, it's good to see the back of them. See you, CAMY, don't the screen door hit you in the ass on the way out.
traced an existing straight skirt up to the waistline, and cut out identical front and back pieces for the
It rained all day and we were in a state of mild trepidation because we thought that the Paramore concert would be outside and that we would be exposed to the elements. In the event the venue was an amphitheatre in the Park Sowinskiego with a tent cover so our worries were for nought.
That’s what I don’t tell them, see. That I’m happy doing what I do. Seems more important to them that I was a hotshot with a bat many moons ago.
Seven and a half out of twenty? Guess I can't claim my badge. I suck at everything...
I was always taught -- or maybe I just assumed -- that emotional and rational thought were two very separate things. Much as I might understand something rationally, how I processed it and what emotions that process inspired were other matters altogether.
Please don’t bother trying to find her
The kids also like telling spoooky stories after the great candy hunt with only the light from the fire......great for sound effects and grandiose gestures (with the occasional crackling noise from furtive wrappers) and hushed, quiet, cliff-hanger voices that grow LOUDER at plot points and character changes.
I remember the exact moment I thought of this book. It was in 2008 and my brother was about to get married. I was sleeping on the floor in the office because of all of the family members who had come into town for the wedding and everyone was talking about love and marriage and relationships and I started wondering if there was some sort of job focused just on relationships. Somehow that led me to the idea of a professional breakup artist and a month later I had finished my book. So thanks, Jared for getting married!
I haven’t found them to be necessary but then again we use our eggs fairly quickly after they’ve been washed. The sooner you use your eggs, the lower the risk of any kind of contamination. I understand though, that some people might not be as comfortable with germs and bacteria as I am (ex-clinical microbiologist) and so I have been looking for some kind of cleaner to recommend to people that is both effective at cleaning while still being safe for use (I’ll go on the record as saying, I’d never put bleach on any of my eggs.)
The Worldbook Typical Course of Study has been the main part of my IHIPs for a long time. Now I'm going to print it out and use it as our guide. Already I'm feeling a lot of stress being lifted. We're both at that point where we just want to be free of a set curriculum and start using our own various and fun assortment of materials.
Keep coming back here if you would like to see my progress on becoming the man I want to be. I am going to keep track like Eli did, except mine is going to be online. I hope it helps others who are like me.
In the critiques of modern capitalism, what is distinctively absent is any mention that all financial bubbles are saturated with excesses in hype, speculation, debt, greed, fraud, gross errors in investment judgment, carelessness on the part of analysts and investors, huge paper profits, conviction that a new era economy has arrived and, above all else, pie-in-the-sky expectations.
He lived without something as fundamental as features.
-Terry Cloth
I lose some of the details at that point in the chemical haze of adrenaline, endorphins, and hormones. He spanks me, not to my absolute limit, but close. You hold me, push your fingers into my mouth at first, then cover my mouth as I get nearer to an out-and-out howl. And then, without warning, the guy abruptly pulls my panties down to mid-thigh, exposing me to anyone who's still nearby, and plunges two fingers into my pussy, which is so ridiculously wet that they slide in without any resistance. And it is so exactly what I have wanted that it's a good thing your hand is still over my mouth because I let out a shriek, and I tense for the inevitable orgasm that always comes with penetration for me…but he pulls out just as suddenly as he thrust in. And I’m left gasping, gaping, empty and clenching around nothing. I whimper. You help me straighten up, and we're back where we started, you and I facing each other with him standing behind me. You look faintly puzzled, but not displeased. I have the distinct feeling again that this wasn't exactly the way it was supposed to go.
The day my grandmother died was the day my life spiraled into a pit of seemingly insurmountable darkness. I went to therapy, at my mother’s instance and my denial of course. The story and journey are both lengthy, littered with despair, verbal abuse, divorce, and the need to find a way out. The lesson, however, is short: everything happens for a reason.
Besides ‘favouriting’ tweets (which you can handily sync with Google Reader), I use
But those decades were defined by anti-Apartheid. The movement had its fair selection of heads both hot and soft, but even a strong aversion to Desmond Tutu couldn't stir much sympathy for the Vogon Bothas.
In fact, when I was in elementary school, I was the girl who trotted over the mile run finish line 2 minutes after the qualifying time.
EDITED TO SAY: And after all my rushing about - I missed the OLW deadline anyway! That wouldn't ever have happened to any of you would it?!
It was too late. I jumped and flapped my wings, and dad ran in and tried to catch me. My wings didn’t work properly and I fell like how I think a stone would fall if it had wings.
You can tell that Tessa has really changed since the first book. Her skin has grown thicker. I liked how it wasn't as much about her powers and accepting the world around her as it was about helping the world she has come to love, and those in it. Then there is Will and Jem, and well, I can't even get into them. I love them both and I hate how there is an expiration date on Jem. I could feel his time ticking away, but this book also wasn't about Tessa coming to terms with his illness, it was about her realizing that there was ten times more to Jem than his illness. Will deals with a lot in this book, and we learn a lot about him and I have a feeling your opinion about him will be irrevocably altered. I always loved him, but now I see him in a whole new light.
I think every makeup lover goes through phases where there is a particular product or colour they are on the hunt for. The past while I've been all about purple blushes. I've always had a soft spot for purple lip product so this was just the natural progression of things.
27-What is the closest you've come to death?
In the late 80s, Björk appeared as backing vocalist with veteran singer- songwriter Megas (Magnus Thor Jonsson) - the Icelandic Bob Dylan and "grandfather of punk" - on three of his albums, "Loftmynd", "Hoefudlausnir" and "Haettuleg Hljomsveit Og Glaepakendid Stella" (the latter having something to do with "The Criminal Woman Stella"). Also appearing on Megas' melodic "Loftmynd" is ex-Strawberry Switchblade Rose McDowell, and Björk's sister, Ingar Guemudsdottir. (Ingar, incidentally, also played in the noisy new wave band Blatt Afram, whose only recorded legacy is two songs on the 1897 live cassette "Snarl 2", otherwise notable for its two Sugarcubes songs "Mykjan" and "Skalli").
Anyway, I'm rambling again, so, what else is going on in my life? Well, nothing earth-shatteringly exciting, but there is a chance that I'll be let out of the house on Wednesday, released from my desk, freed from the constraints of the computer to nip down the road to Durham to meet my old friend Sasha for a bit of a catch-up, and maybe a little glass of wine or two. I reckon I deserve a bit of a treat, I haven't had a proper day (or night, come to think of it) out for so long! A ridiculously long time, actually. So, I'm looking forward to it. And hopefully that'll take me mind off this obsessive search for the perfect book title. Hopefully.
Passport To Pimlico 1949 British comedy movie created by Ealing Studios and starred Stanley Holloway, Margaret Rutherford, and Hermione Baddeley. It absolutely was directed by Henry Cornelius.
The Pardon Me For Asking Blog makes a clear case against the Hannah Senesh School's expansion into the courtyard, which the school is presently using for a parking lot.
Whatever prompted the Guelph Mercury to publish a Page One puff piece on city Coun. Ian Findlay? Then more accolades on the editorial page saluting Mr. Findlay’s business survival in the diminishing world of store front DVD rentals.
Coffee lover – and I am for sure.
By any Chance are your using Kaspersky Anti Virus? If so here is the fix..
If you’re talking sex it means, “TITS ARE FOR TRANNIES.” Yelling out or typing a capitalized TR4T when things have things have become too sexy for your tastes diffuses the tension by creating a layer of confusion between you and the awkward sex talker. They will think, “Does he really believe tits are only for trannies? Well, then what are women supposed to do with their tits? I mean, think of all those wasted hooters. Is this man gay or just mentally challenged?” Regardless, it keeps the creeper off talk of balls and whores and his or her sexual escapades because you don’t want to picture them having sex anyway. Win-Win.
The Verses of the Qur'an and the Sunna (the Prophet's legal ways, orders etc.) have exhorted greatly for Jihad and have made quite clear its rewards, and praised greatly thosewhoperform Jihad (the holy fighting in Allah's Cause) and explained to them various kinds of honours which they will receive from their Lord (Allah swt). This is because they-Mudahidin are Allah's troops. Allah (swt) will establish His religion (Islam), with them (Mujahidin). He will repel the might of His enemies, and with them He will protect Islam and guard the religion safely.
Yesterday, twenty one year old Swiss volunteer, Jael Krummernacher, was raped in the city of Salta. Krummernacher had traveled to Salta doing evangelical mission work with the Anglican Church.
While I appreciate that you were obviously raised in some backwoods, nasty and uncivilized manner where consideration for others was never instilled, here in the civilized world we decent human beings generally behave far less selfishly and disruptively than you have chosen to conduct yourselves thus far.
“Oh, well. I’m moving in with my fiance. I’ve moved around a lot for my job over the past few years and we are getting a place together. I don’t need this extra stuff so I just have to get rid of it.”
2. We need discipleship.
They ran the bell - and Mrs Patterson was trying hard to warn the couple by telling them: "We cannot open the gate for you now, please go away', while one of the men held a gun to her head.
Upon the straits; – on the French coast the light
In other news, Keaton has started crawling while I've been hospitalized. I missed it. *sob*
The Crowdfunding Accreditation for Platform Standards (CAPS) program is an initiative by Crowdsourcing.org to promote the adoption of best practices for the operation of crowdfunding platforms globally.
But a lot can happen in a little bit of time. And since April 1, 2012, I had my nearly perfect day with Harry. And we have been almost inseparable since. Not physically, but we talk every chance we get, and he comes to see me every chance he gets. Since we are both busy, it is not daily, but it’s as often as possible. And with his schedule things are always kind of up in the air. His birthday is Saturday. Just in case I can’t see him that day, I wanted to be prepared and get him a gift. So I got online and I bought him a shave at a fancy barbershop in LA. He’s got a goatee and a bald head. I had no idea if he’d like it or not but I took a chance. The gift card came in the mail today and I ran to the store to get something to put it in.
each week you will write from one to the other, asking questions, maybe answering questions, giving snippets of information so these 2 strangers can get to know each other.
But there are also just people who made silly mistakes and said stupid things to the wrong people and never really thought about the consequences. Forgiveness isn't really in my nature but when it comes down to it well intentioned ignorance is not the same as idiocy and has to be forgiven. And the upside is finding out that what you thought was malicious really wasn't, which kind of brightens things up. :)
My good friend and Spruce Room colleague, Kristenza, who has a knack for knowing just what somebody desires, gave me the very lovely, "Twelve Owls," by Laura Erickson, illustrations by Betsy Bowen. This book is for adults and older kids, but the illustrations and the words can certainly be shared with our younger friends. Some of the vignettes that Erickson tells about the twelve owls native to Minnesota are quite poignant and interesting, and could be read aloud to preschoolers before bedtime.
One of the things I’m getting used to as a foreigner in a land where everything looks unusual – from the fruit and veg to the billboards – is things not being what they at first appear to be. How many times have I been walking past what looks like a ramshackle mishmash of cardboard, metal sheeting and wood only to catch a glimpse of someone asleep on a mattress inside? Just about every shop sign in Westlake says it is either a Bia Hoi, Ca Fe or Deli. Just how many delis and coffee shops can there possibly be!?
The second day was similar to the first, but with fewer episodes. He still cried and pushed away, but near the end of the torrent, he reached out for a hug and within moments was calm and right as rain.
members of the band.
The names of tyrants and evil personalities should be avoided such as Fir'awn, Qarun, Abu Lahab etc.. Likewise it is disliked to name with the names of the Surahs of the Quran like 'Ta Ha' or 'Ya Sin' as is reported from Imam Malik and others. There is no authentic hadith which ascribes the above two as being names of the Prophet (peace and blessings be upon him).
Cover and store leftovers in the fridge for up to 2 weeks.
Oh goodness gracious, I absolutely adored Die For Me! Where do I start?
region of Spain. Our colorful platter had salami, olives,
The pieces in the photos ranged from $1.00 to $4.00 WITH the cup and saucer....I!'m looking to build a collection of inexpensive but antique/vintage goodies for Brunches/Teas/desserts! Today's finds fit the bill!
- 4 protective stud at base
“How much do I owe you?” she asked, reaching into her purse.
A light to medium coverage, silicone-based oil-free liquid foundation. The weightless formula creates a naked feel to the skin, good coverage and a natural flawless finish.
Techniques:
Google is your friend. In the search bar, lets put in a topic that interests you....say you are real big on camping, primitive living and wilderness survival.
Bowl held over head
I FINALLY had a day off on Sunday. To celebrate this occasion, my wife and I got up early and ran a few chores then stopped to have a nice breakfast at Bruegger’s. I got a cinnamon sugar bagel with sausage and egg on it topped with honey walnut cream cheese. Talk about a breakfast wonder. I usually get that combination with the Maple Cream cheese but apparently that is only “seasonal.” BORING. But it all worked out because the honey walnut complemented the cinnamon sugar quite nicely. My wife had a parmesan italian bagel, which is not usually the flavor that I want in the morning but, as I mentioned, I had the day off which meant we had done some drinking the night before… perfect for a hung over stomach with a little cream cheese on it.
*Sam had a seizure on March 22nd. She had gone 8 1/2 months without one, which was great! I hate that she had the seizure, but I'd be really happy if we could keep them to a minimum. Her (new) neurologist wanted to start her on a second medication (Lamictal), but I'm holding off on that for now. She's doing so well on her Keppra, and I hate to add another med to the mix because of one seizure. If she starts having more frequent seizures again I'll have to rethink that, but for now I want to wait and see what happens.
Some Obnoxious Customer. 100 to 1
CEO, Whole Foods Market Inc
55gr butter
I was expecting you to be nice, well because I know you are nice.
SET ASIDE for 5 minutes
My breaths became laboured as I continued, the frustration besting my capacity for control until I finally, woefully, and pitifully snapped.
I found Vonnegut when I was a teenager. He made me feel sane. I listened to some metal when I was a teen, and it made me feel like it was alright to be angry sometimes. I grew up alongside Harry Potter and when he felt sad and alienated, I totally understood because so did I.
So here is my version, in a spooky Halloween theme..
Planning a visit to the US and preparing for it took a lot of time. Applying for jobs and interviewing took more time. Then the day was here to head to America for a very special event!
Pride and Prejudice by Jane Austen
And, oh! what beautiful years were there
For our four starters, we chose: #1: "Philly Cheesesteak" - airbread, cheddar, Wagyu beef ($8 on regular menu). I had liked the taste of this one from a previous visit - it's every bit as amazing as it sounds, with slices of buttery beef carpaccio layered on top of steaming, fluffy cheese-filled bread.
Since ARISE was established in 1986, it has trained and certified over 5,531 ARISE Life-Skills Group Facilitators who have taught over 4,824,576 documented hours (averaging 13,646 hours per month) of the interactive ARISE Life Skills lessons to at-risk youth and teens across the United States and beyond. The ARISE program is in use in Canada, Jamaica, England, Australia, Bahamas, Bermuda, New Zealand, Mexico, Puerto Rico, Bosnia, Kazakhstan, The Kingdom of Bahrain, South Africa, Vietnam, Uganda, Nigeria and Haiti.
For those of you following along with our house hunt, we went to see 2 homes today in our favorite neighborhood. One was out of our budget, but we wanted to see it anyway for comparison purposes. Thankfully, the bedrooms were oddly laid out upstairs so we didn't fall in love with it (but the first floor was perfection). The other house was pretty decent, but was built about 20 years ago and we would definitely need to do some renovations (i.e., new kitchen, new bathroom). Property Brothers, anyone? It totally gives us something to think about though. The inventory has been super low here, but our realtor thinks things will pick up in the next month. We are keeping our fingers crossed! I am tired driving through the neighborhood yelling "come on people, sell your house!"
Lily's Friday Prediction will be closing its doors. As a writing exercise and community-builder, it's fostered the dreams of many for over two years. Lily has been a gracious and kind host, and it will be missed. If you want to get in on the last few Predictions and be a part of it, I suggest you check it out now.
1 C. coconut flakes
In the end, I was pulled into this world by the heroine. She has a dry humor, but she knows when to hold her tongue.
At last night's technique class we learned the Dazzling Diamonds Dust technique. I had found this on several other demonstrator's blogs lately and we had such a fun time making it. I am entering the card in the Stampin' Queen's Sketch Challenge SQSC31 and I hope you go check out their fun website. Here is the sketch:
On East 16th Street in Flatbush, a few young boys are playing cricket in the street, watched over by a dad. Pure Brooklyn, the kids, West Indian, South Asian and white, take turns wielding the cricket bat with great seriousness, laughing with glee as they get the occasional hit. No doubt the asphalt streets provide a stickier wicket than a wet and drying pitch, which makes the ball'spin and bounce sharp and unpredictable. But it is a school day afternoon and the Flatbush street is far from the weekend cricket games played at Prospect Park, or Staten Island's New Dorp near Miller Field (which was a keystone to Joseph O'Neill's wonderful novel, Netherland). Here you can imagine the game that may have been played in British 18th century New York. Now, played again widely in the city, taught by immigrant kids to their friends,not just a weekend team sport with crisp and gleaming white uniforms on the fields of Prospect Park, but now, also a street game and urban sport, evolving on the streets of Brooklyn.
Fine Print:
She giggled back. My mind raced, and the question, "Could she be a spanko?" flitted around my brain.
You may know that Pam is my sister-in-law, that she lives in Germany, and that she's one of the best friends I've ever had.
He has a girlfriend
For the background on this one I used bv08, and g14 along with w7. For the transfer I used bv04 and yg05. For the page I used all of the above colors plus yg23, rv91 and bv13.
This presents problems for naïve people who are not familiar with Islam and the Koran. They don’t know that the surahs/chapters of the Koran are not arranged in chorological order in regard to the timing in which they were written. Therefore, an activist who is out to deceive them can turn to various places throughout the Koran and read verses that sound peaceful, tolerant, reasonable and loving. The impression is that the entire Koran promotes peace, love, equality and tolerance for all. That is far from the truth. Most muslims fully understand that the few Koranic verses that seemingly promote equality, peace and justice are more often than not overridden/nullified by later verses that validate such things as terrorism and legalistic restrictions on routine human and women’s rights.
Running till you were out of breath, laughing so hard that your stomach hurt.
The sellers: The developer of the property was Montevetro Limited, a company in the Real Estates Opportunities (REO) group which in turn is controlled by Treasury Holdings. The land was owned by CIE (state owned transport company) and it is understood CIE retained an interest in the site and has benefited from the sale to Google. It is also understood that NAMA Top 10 developer, Derek Quinlan had an interest in the development, possibly 30%. The loan underpinning the building was acquired by NAMA in April/May 2010 and since that time, NAMA has had a degree of control over the property through its ownership of the loan.
No matter - It was great fun, I've made new friends in both beer and wine, and every drink was excellent in its own right.
The half pint was the most colourful and attractive but the third pint goblet was most sleek in its shape. Although for quantity what you really want is the pint!
Now you might be asking why I would want to do such a thing. The main reason has nothing to do with the fact I am a mad collector of all things Pooh…though I am. It has much more to do with the fact that I caught myself singing that as I was getting ready for bed that last two nights. My first thought was, “Hm, I’m hungry. Maybe I should eat something so that my rumbly tumbly doesn’t keep me awake all night…” I was half way to the kitchen when I shook myself out of auto-pilot and stopped dead in my tracks.
The appeal involved an invention relating to activating services when configuring a "build to order" system. The Examiner rejected the claims as anticipated over a single prior art reference ("Lee"), and provided citations to allegedly disclosed features. The Appellants argued that the Examiner "failed to explain how the relied upon prior art reference discloses an element of the claim."
The shadows touched my foot. They were cold. The seat disappeared from under me as everything faded.
these girls just get it.
Deschutes Obsidian Stout
I've got you under my skin where the rain can't get in,
They argue at first due to her spoiled and unrealistic outlook on life, class, caste, and reality. Soon enough she is in no hurry to be rescued, as she schemes to invent ways to have him perform kinky acts upon her while making it appear not to be her idea. She at least arranges a thin veil of plausible deniability, just in case.
Has this ever happened to you? You put on a favorite sweater then snag it with your jewelry? That's what I managed to do to my cashmere sweater with the studded strap bracelet below. I can see the pulled bit sticking out on my arm in the picture. I'm usually so careful about the jewelry I wear with sweaters, but I missed it this time. *arrgh*
He earned a mention in this column because of one of the legends/miracles attributed to him, "The Legend of the Beer Mug." The story goes that on an extremely hot day in July 642, after Arnold died at the Abbey of Remiremont where he moved after his retirement, the parishioners from Metz showed up to claim his remains.
Those so inclined will also benefit from an examination of the principles and techniques of Ericksonian and Milton Model hypnosis, also known as Conversational Hypnosis due to its use of apparently innocent language to affect behaviour and thinking.
Watching the leaves dance their way to their deaths. Noticing how some will stay alight for just that much longer.
He is an artist and a motivational speaker
Autoimmune diseases are also characterized by a disorder of the immune system with the abnormal production of antibodies (autoantibodies) that are directed against the tissues of the body. Examples of autoimmune diseases include not only those that feature inflammation in the joints, such as systemic lupus erythematosus, Sjogren’s syndrome, and rheumatoid arthritis, but also disease of other organs, such as occurs in Hashimoto’s thyroiditis and juvenile diabetes mellitus.
This is how far he was in November... almost done with phase 1(approx 100 hours worth?)
Please keep praying for the general health of the team. Stomach issues are still a problem, though imodium has done the trick for several of our team members. Everybody is in good spirits. There is a great amount of cooperation among team members and we are having a blast with the kids here.
Dear Students,
Stack the slices of bread, and then cut them diagonally into quarters. You should have 24 triangles.
I'm in love with Voile. Are you ?
With a major emphasis on the almost part of that sentence, because while I love looking at pretty food, I love eating pretty food even more.
Yea, I am a sucker for lap dogs.
Being a Kikay mom, of course, I joined the contest! Though I already have a few brush sets, an addition to my growing cosmetic tools collection would be great! So I hope I can win this giveaway :)
The band was incredible. I’ll share more about each of them when the record is released. But, I’ll say this now: they are some of the best musicians in the world, no lie! At least that is what I’ve been told by everyone in the music business who finds out who played on my album. And, all I can say for sure is that they sounded amazing and played so incredibly well together. The songs are definitely better for having them play on the record. I am extremely grateful. In fact, they didn’t stop playing a song until they felt in the heart they did their best. It was pretty incredible.
9 god
So, you might be wondering why I am calling this a foodie treat. Feast your eyes upon this perfect scene:
DAIBUTSU in KOTOKU-IN
Travis Lewis - Oklahoma – One advantage for defenses is playing with a lead, forcing the opponent into a one dimensional offense. This is going to be the case a lot for the Sooners this season. Lewis, the team tackle leader from last season, will use it to his advantage. He will be vaulting up draft boards by mid-season.
Of course I was a huge fan of the first album and thought that it was so ironic that Nas' collection of unreleased music was almost as impressive as any retail LP he ever dropped....I'm not exactly sure what we're in for this go round' partially b/c I'm pretty sure I've heard just about every Nas record, released or otherwise there is...Either way, gettin some of the longtime unreleased fav.'s in good listening condition won't be anything I'll complain about.
If you're in Melbourne and like a bit of comedy go and check out Danny Bhoy at the Arts Centre. We were lucky to have a kid free night and headed off to the comedy festival for a bit of a laugh. Once again Danny's live show was awesome, one of the best observational comics going around at the moment.
Although I am very happy in my Havaianas flip flops,
So in 1hour and 5 minutes I walked 5.05 km, burned 391 calories and climbed 4 floors (little hills really). I really enjoy those Fitbit stats! For the whole day I did 11800 steps and by the way I am now participating in a walking challenge at “stopping the wind” and I will go log my steps before I forget again…
+ Complaining about your relationship (to others): complaining against one’s partner – either to the person, to other people or to oneself is dominant in some relationships. Some people think that complaining or pointing out the flaws will make them change but it makes things worse instead. If there’s anything your partner is doing that displeases you, or if he/she possesses a trait that you find annoying, the best thing to do is to talk to him/her about it or ignore such trait or behavior completely.
“Maybe.” Tupper gave the man’s sleeve a firm tug, urging, “Let’s go see why.”
‘Good Girl!’ I yelped with an audible smile on my face.
I love Pets. I think everyone should have one. If I didn’t have a pet I’d be pretty lonely.
These memories are so beautiful
The Heavenly Treasures Network consist of over 50 micro-enterprise livelihood projects in 13 countries around the world. At the Heavenly Treasures shop, HT Handicrafts, you can purchase a wonderful variety of arts and handicrafts, and know that 100% of the proceeds will go to the livelihood project selling the items.
the poor man's bird of paradise-- there in the yard.
Not only were we given the Torah but we were also given the mental capacity as Jews to study Torah, acquire wisdom enclosed, so we can understand creation the best way possible. As a result, we can take care of the world that G~d created and emulate Him by perfecting it through these acts especially through observance of the memorial of creation: Shabbat. This is what sets the scene for the Torah and why it is mentioned “In The Beginning” (pun slightly intended.)
viewed in Excel in table or graph form in order to analyze peak traffic days and hours. The database file keeps growing every time the data is exported, so the u… Read More >>
I have looked into ArtFire as I know that buyers do not need to register to make a purchase.
It has been a few days since I finished this book and I am still in shock. I am still asking myself why would anyone want to fake being a 9/11 survivor or claim to be a survivor or any horrific accident for that matter.
Since it was downtown, and my mom also had to pick my sister up and drive her downtown a bit later (Emi's drum teacher, who's a really cool guy, offered to have her sell her handmade stuff between sets at the place where his band plays), she dropped Ty and I off at a Metro (also know in other places as the train/subway) station, and we headed downtown! It was rather funny, by the time we got to the last leg of our commute, it was so obvious that the great majority of people on the train with us were also heading to the same punk concert we were! When we got there, the opening band, The Riverboat Gamblers, were about halfway through their set, so we watched them for a while. They were pretty good! However, it was raining pretty hard at the start, so even though I had a raincoat on, I still got pretty wet. Wet, but not cold, so I was still quite cheerful. :-) Next came Rancid. They're good! I'd only ever heard a few of their songs, so I didn't enjoy them as much as I could have, but I really want to hear more of their music now...
“I think what we’re seeing is a lot of kids who are given power and immediately begin to abuse it,” Tasca observes. “Some of these guys are as young as 18 years old. You give them a uniform, and it goes right to their head. And even many of those that don’t do abusive things miss the point, which is that we’re supposed to be peace officers. They get a badge and a gun and they think they’re gods, or at least that they’re entitled to treat people like dirt. I see them as people, and insist on treating them like I’d want to
It’s an imperfectly perfect ending to a film about an imperfectly perfect holiday. NATIONAL LAMPOON’S CHRISTMAS VACATION is a splendid movie, and serves as an antithesis, of sorts, to Dr. Seuss’ How the Grinch Stole Christmas. Where the Grinch believes the worst about Christmas, Clark believes the best, yet both are surrounded by people who believe the opposite of their own yuletide attitudes; in the end, Christmas brings both communities together.
Snow Patrol are a lot of fun, but much more of a low key affair than Cold Play. Fun to hear their old songs, as well as some of the new ones. I think my favorite new song is "Just say Yes." Favorite old one I would have to say "Run".
ADD salsa and beans. Bring to boil; cover. Simmer on medium-low heat 5 min. or until chicken is done (165ºF).
Working from tabloids from Québec, my home. Echos Vedettes is a People-style entertainment magazine, and Photo Police a lewd and trashy tabloid that’s like a print version of Cops. Aimed at older people who like to fret over the degredation of Quebecois society, it (of course) hypocritically features a lot of lascivious stories and adds for escort services. It’s downright hilarious. I’m shocked it’s still in print, honestly.
If our devotion, in assisting at Mass be great our advantage will be also great; if little, it will be but little. We may gain more by hearing one Mass devoutly than by twenty without devotion.
Exciting projects were specially created for THE HANDYMANs HANDBOOK by international design consultants. The home handyman can now make for himself stylish and original furnishings for every room in the home and for every member of the family. The projects range from a selection of attractive and practical systems for finishing your own fitted kitchen to a set of intriguing “jig saw cushions, from a surprisingly simple method for making upholstered furniture of even the most elaborate shapes to a series of carefully Grafted wooden blocks from which any number of striking toys can be assembled. Other projects offer original approaches to basic shelving, screens and drawer units, providing different solutions to the most common problems in the home today storage and display.
Ben is drawn in by an old flame who is the sister of the dead guy when she too suddenly feels in threat of her life and soon they link it all to an old letter, reputedly written by Mozart, that her father found many years before and which her brother had been researching.
My first impression of Sadie--everyone's first impression, I have no doubt--was her height... This was a woman who had probably last worn heels to her own wedding, and even for that occasion she might have picked a dress that would hide just one more pair of low- or no-heels, chosen so she wouldn't tower comically over the groom. She was six feet at least, maybe a little more... Sadie had, in the argot of the day, a really good build. She knew it and was self-conscious about it rather than proud. I could tell that from the way she walked.
3.you can add any greens like corriander leaves,spring onion,spinach leaves ,grated bottle gourd or fenugreek leaves for flavour of your own choice.
Their attempts, always futile,
Bodie and Brock have four grown children—Rachel, Jake, Luke, and Ellie—and seven grandchildren. Their sons, Jake and Luke, are carrying on the Thoene family talent as the next generation of writers, and Luke produces the Thoene audiobooks.
VIDAL: We have been waiting for a response and a reaction by the
I you know an Australian MacDougall, then you may have heard their unofficial motto. The official motto is “victory or death”, although throughout history, Macdougalls have not been so good at either. Bronny pokes her tongue out at Tim The motto that Tim’s family uses is “that will come in handy one day”. It took over 7 months to move out of their farm. Purchased in 1937, there was already a room that had never been used in Tim’s lifetime because it was full of stuff. Cousins turned up who Tim had never met to collect stuff from the farm as they moved. Want a 1943 harvestor? Sure, come on over.
In other words uncertainty and uncertainty, particularly in the financial markets, is never a good thing!
As we head into 2011 — and the publication of my second book, “Malled; My Unintentional Career in Retail” (Portfolio, April 2011) — I’m seriously re-thinking how I dress, knowing media interviews and speaking events are soon to fill my calendar. As I wrote in the book, a memoir of selling clothing in a suburban mall, working with men and women 20 to 30 years younger whose looks were so different from my own reminded me weekly how differently we each choose to present ourselves to the wider world.
Emily, raising five orphaned grandchildren, had to beg among neighbours for a measly bag containing a couple of scoops of barley grain – enough to just about survive on for two days at most.
Nally used classified ads to locate and obtain the animals, often finding people to willingly drop off their pets thinking they had found a good home, police said.
The track Suggestion goes beyond its intended topic to become applicable for multiple human rights issues in a period where prejudice and sexual implication were impossible to avoid in the creative arts. Skeptics aside, the performance of this track inspired many to form their own groups that would address a similar issue. This provocative message was able to reach many due to the band’s attitude to their live performances and business practices.
Or, she’d walk to the deep end, stand at the edge, and dive right in. She’d then swim the length of the pool.
Oh, that must be it. I’m seriously missing something from my life. I have lots of unmet needs, and I’m looking to my therapist to fill them, so this is why I act this way. I’m really more fucked up than I thought.(insert sad, sad face here)
Jim Wyckoff has been involved with the stock, financial and futures markets for more than 20 years. He was born and raised in Iowa, where he still resides.
“The thing is, a lot of people tend to drink a lot of the same – if they like Pinot Grigio, then they will often drink that. But here you have the chance to try lots of unusual wines from places you might not expect.”
It's a collection of short stories. They're all set in Lincolnshire, and so are - hopefully - held together by a sense of place rather than any narrative links. I wanted the reader to have the sense of these stories happening to people who were within sight of each other, but out of reach. Connected but not connected. I figured all that out quite late on though; initially, I just kept finding ideas for stories in the unsettlingly
And you want to smile, but you have to sigh
Consider???? Really??? How about DO NOT!!!
On a good note though, I talked to my doctor's office about the Explanation of Benefits we got last week. They did get a copy of the test results from the pathologist and as far as they can tell #1 the results were completely normal (which we totally would have expected) and #2 it appears the only tissue that was tested was umbilical cord and placenta. Which means…they didn’t cut on you!!!!!!!!!!!! Now I’m just going off of what the nurse at the doctor’s office told me from when she read the results, but that’s good enough for me! I’ll ask when I see the doctor again next week just to be sure. But as of right now, things are looking promising in the - you being buried whole category! I was majorly relieved.
In all three species, the farm-raised fish were fattier. Not surprising since farm-raised fish do not spend their lives vigorously swimming through cold ocean waters or leaping up rocky streams. Marine couch potatoes, they circle lazily in crowded pens fattening up on pellets of fish chow.
Many thanks to Matt (he did survive) and to Justin for the use of the image.
So what has this got to do with you?
Indeed, yesterday, the Prospect Heights Neighborhood Development Council asked Adams's boss, Gov. Andrew Cuomo, and Mayor Mike Bloomberg to stop the scheduled construction of a surface parking lot for the project, given that the release of plans for the lot has been delayed six months and there had been no response to residents' concerns.
We had known that there was a hiking trail (Bald River Trail #88) along the river above the falls, but we had never hiked it. So while Betsy was enjoying Bald River Falls, I took a quick hike along the trail to see what I could find.
My frosts congeal the rivers in their flow,
I kept going back to them. And thinking again. Nothing! Was I writing about a crazy dream I had? Was I in the throes of dementia and didn’t know what I was doing? What?!?
Tears no longer fall from his glazed eyes, saline and Vaseline emulate their formation. Respirators rasp, drowning out his pleas as he slips in and out of consciousness. He feels no pain she knows but he also feels nothing. It is this she cannot bear. Nothing below the neck. No urge to urinate or defecate, no pain, no pleasure. No childhood pleasure, no diving, no racing with the wind; unable to embrace. This is no life.
They said Alison was found outside the fence so we walked that short distance and took a picture. This isn't the story that was sent with her bio but it doesn't really matter.
“As if a woman ever loved a man for his virtue,” Kitty mocked.”
The problem, as Esman notes, is this: forms of speech that would incite some religious groups to violence would not do so for others. (Note as well that incitement to “discrimination,” a much more slippery issue, is also prohibited).
Reasons provided for the proliferation of blogs:
helpful girls on the cookie forum. There is always something new to learn or share.
Anyway, a few years later, after the momentous discovery of authenticity, I found myself with a small mountain of pretty, but useless, frocks. Mum kept a couple (I am kicking myself not not getting pics of them too when I was over there this morning) and the rest I ripped the embroidery off and clagged them onto a green wool tunic for my stepdad, Peter, figuring that since they do the odd village fete, etc, where some kind of half hearted attempt at costume is required, he could make use of it. Someone might as well.
5.) Monsters
Makes me happy!
Now if you forgive me I need to go find this pin I misplaced....It is around here somewhere....I hope....I pray?
Deep Black Episode 1
At the bottom of the garden lives a cherub made of cold, cold stone. It sits and watches and holds a cold, cold stone bird in its chubby, chipped hands. They are stuck together, trapped together. And yet it seems as though the cherub has the advantage even so. That bird is doomed. I pity it.
from Lilybee Designs.
08-12 Ghent, Belgium - St. Peter's Square
A big worry for internet users in Ireland regards downloading copyrighted material, and the internet being an insidious place (by design), it can sometimes be hard to figure out if what you're doing is wrong. Man of brilliance, Sean Sherlock, now offers outstanding help for users. If a "copyright holder" decides that you are downloading the wrong file (they know better than you, idiots are incapable of holding copyright, after all) they can make your ISP turn off your ability to download that file. As an added bonus, and at no cost, they will also stop you from downloading any other files.
- The Ocean: I am a big believer in the power of water to provide calm, clarity and energy. If you can’t be near the ocean give yourself a few minutes more in the shower with the water cascading over your head. Or for a quick pick-me-up cool, running water on the inside of your wrists.
Although an impending delivery of new bulbs will undoubtedly bring light back to the failing module, the implication that astronauts aboard something like the International Space Station – or some special, trans-galaxial touring edition, launched twenty-five years from now – might be faced with total darkness, a darkness from which they cannot be rescued, is mind-boggling.
The one matter above any other that we all had on our minds, the unspoken agreement we shared, was that there would be no dealing in substances on those premises. Even conversation about drugs was discouraged, at least with the straight people who were often disposed to ask us drug-related questions. We were all quite clear about the risks to everyone; we understood that there would be agents and law-enforcement officers mingling among us to obtain information, that thrill-seeking tourists would try to lure us into supplying. So the drug portion of our hippie culture was not on display during the days when sightseers swarmed the grounds. But at night, when the country club was closed to the public, we discreetly used what we had brought, hidden in the privacy of our own spaces, with people we knew and trusted.”
2. Mix together the two ingredients in a bowl, add salt and pepper, and soy sauce.
In a medium bowl, cream together the shortening and 1 1/2 cups sugar. Stir in the eggs. Sift together the flour, baking soda, cream of tartar, and salt; stir into the creamed mixture until well blended. In a small bowl, stir together the 2 tablespoons of sugar, and the cinnamon. Roll dough into walnut sized balls, then roll the balls in the cinnamon-sugar. Place them onto an unprepared cookie sheet, two inches apart.
"Oh, that's a relief. When you didn't talk right away I thought maybe you liked it."
Like what people will think about my decisions. Like what people will think about OUR decisions. I have people in my life that can be judgmental and don't necessarily think letting things just "happen" is the way approach certain life decisions.
yikes.
Onion chopped: 3 cup
That's grilled heart, baby. Peruvian grilled heart on a skewer. Don't let the organ meat scare you off. Heart looks like cut-up steak. You get a strong beef flavor. You get a little more chew than you'd get from filet, but way more flavor. Chick'n Pollo puts a minor char on the meat.
This is the first draft of the new rendition, - it will be printed 8.5 x 11 card stock :
We may have heard that “all of life is worship”. Clueless for how to achieve this, we try to “do more” worshipful thinking and feeling, hoping maybe that if we do more in the Jesus category, it will overflow somehow into the others.
Jack Ponton complains of noise in rural environments. But these are hardly silent as any visiting townie who has been rudely awakened by cockerels or church bells will attest. It is the nature of the noise which is novel - and country bumpkins will soon become as accustomed to it as are urbanites to the sound of road and rail.
I have seen American comic Doctor Brown (not to be confused with Doc Brown) several times and, to be frank, his act can be a bit hit-and-miss. Well, it’s not so much an act. It’s more a let’s-go-on-stage and see-what-might-happen-with-the-audience performance. On the basis of last night, he should team up with the very large black man with one eye, a speech defect, a mostly shaven head, a beard and what appeared to be an MP3 player plugged into his ears.
On the reverse side, negative results in “Gold” can mean a loss of financial wealth, loss of health, or failed business. As “Glory” it can return as demotion, stuck-career, or loss of access. With “Wisdom,” it can mean a slow to no improvement in knowledge, or loss of credibility from other people. In “Love,” it can be hate from other people or a betrayal.
It reminds me a Buckminster Fuller quote:
But if you thought you could resist Maskarade on the basis of Opera North’s first British professional production in 1991 (which was far from ideal, but still vastly better than the lethargic affair I saw at the Royal Opera in Copenhagen a couple of years ago), then this new Decca recording could well change your mind.
That is to say, as far as particular values are concerned, Zoroastrianism values truth and life above all else.
Political correctness has changed advertising and publications over the years, but sometimes I do wonder if it is for the better.
Oops. That doesn't sound like a great idea.
The problem with the deluge of email we all endure is that all too often something gets by you that you would really want to know. Thus, it is only today that I noticed an obituary for my old friend, boss, and mentor, Jack Scovil.
Fiskars Corner Punch
Saturday evening we brought the finished products to the town square to be judged. (It's not really judged per se -- there were more than 20 awards to be handed out and no child was intended to feel left out.)
I've been super sick all week As in, more-sick-than-I-can-ever-remember. I lost my voice for 3 whole days and did not answer my phone or leave the house, because I was literally mute! Thankfully it was all rain and drear, so I don't think I missed much in the outdoor world. Indoors, Graham had a rave and I sat on the couch, thinking about the 1,000 things I wish I could get done.
Fill the empty skins with the mix, and top with grated cheese if you’re ok with that.
Here is one of the iguanas that like to bask in the sun. They climb up the trees and sit on the roof keeping an eye on the property.
The report rejects the myth that the world needs coal and states, “Down one path lies a dangerous future of impoverished people and an imperiled planet. Down the other is a new way forward made possible by harnessing the limitless and cost effective power of the wind and the sun.”
Eventually some brave soul on the other side of the plane, the side with the Himalayas going by, is not told to put her windowshade down, and they start creeping up all over.
Until I taught in London, where it very often rained!
I quickly discovered that wrapping yarn around a closed form would take way more patience than I was willing to give, so I opened the form back up and wrapped it that way. I used a dab of hot glue to hold each yarn end in place.
I can hear the songs they use to sing,
Often you will hear that something is ‘good on paper’. This means that while it would seem like a delightful idea in theory, once you actually play it out, it doesn’t quite live up to the beautiful list of benefits that may or may not have once listed onto some sort of paper at an earlier moment in time. There are things out there which are more obviously ‘good on paper’ but ‘bad in practice’, such as Communism, Adult Diapers, Napping, Water Beds, or Unprotected Sex. However, some things are much more covertly ‘bad in practice’. Leave it to me to assist you in avoiding the following list of ‘good on paper – bad in practice’ things and shit and whatnot that may otherwise take you by surprise.
6 oz chocolate chips (I always use milk chocolate, use your favorite)
glided down her sides and along her thighs . She was moaning and
Choose Mission Valley Resort and You Won’t be left Planning on Your Own
Give the gift of Correia this week with a paperback copy of Hard Magic. They fit in your pocket of your enormous cargo pants! Mass market paperbacks are the perfect present for your loved ones this Administrative Professionals Day (April 25th, or so my calender says…)
Scout will be (I think) twelve this summer. He's slowing down a bit. His activity has decreased but his love - his love for me has increased a hundred fold. My love for him? I don't think there are enough numbers in all of the Universe to measure how I feel about him - he's priceless.
'Damn me,' said the Chief, 'just who the hell is that big?'
Kelly Ann
Funny cause I can relate to Victor in some ways which is weird, and the book opened up many things. Thank you.
Spillover effects
It is going to my DD2 that lives in NC.
6. The bride fainted
Richard Hugo – Death of the Kapowsin Tavern
Valentine Fabric - JoAnns
Jesus: Unfortunately not. Last year I met with Carlos Ezquerra, which made ​​me remember old times and I got in touch with 2000 AD and Rebellion again.
Stamp: Bildmålarna- Mimosa lighting up
“I am a very old man and have suffered a great many misfortunes, most of which never happened.”which seems to summarise the whole mindset rather well methinks.
Sierra Nevada Celebration Ale 2009
Clearly the duct formed is very small, which limits it use. I doubt it’s to cool KERS, as the KERS is mounted towards the rear of the car and the small duct would not adequately cool batteries or the like. Its position does suggest the flow could pass down to the splitter, so some clever use for blowing or loading the splitter could be within the realms of possibility. More likely is the use to cool the electronics or power steering rack, which are sited much closer to the duct and would require a smaller amount of cooling air.
like particulates of ash
Finely chopped red onion
Video: Obama compares himself to Gandhi and Mandela Hateful Academic Lets Rip at Bibi Have You Joined Conservatives For OPEC? AKA Volt Bashing Right Wingers Записки нового репатрианта Should these Palestinian Arab companies be boycotted? Israel Under Fire from Rocket Attacks by Israel Defense Forces Каир-1952: Сезон охоты на белого человека. 1 Две Исмалиии IAEA: Iran triples higher enriched uranium since November 5-Mar-12: Quote of the Day – On nuclear weapons development “Iran is not providing the necessary cooperation” says UN agency Smart Jews develop their own bunker buster Hamas continues to pressure Egypt for fuel Jamait-e-Muslimin: When 25,000 Nazis Converted To Islam In 1939 Ismail Haniyeh Lashes Out At Israel In Cairo by idfnadesk The Book of Esther goes Western by rogatkaproductions @learner92 The IDF’s purpose is to defend Israeli civilians; that’s the main thought behind the #IronDome development. @Yisrael4Ever Absolutely! The quiet days are the best, for obvious reasons. IAEA: Iindications of ‘unusual activity’ at Iran’s Parchin military base Ystrdy 4,665 tons of goods&gas (including 52 tons of electronics) entered #Gaza from #Israel via Kerem Shalom crossing Linkdump: Reactions to Obama’s AIPAC speech The Real Meaning of Obama’s New Policy: War is Inevitable Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler
Some time around "O," (if my memory serves) Grafton began to move away from standard first-person POV into multiple POV format. This allows Grafton to expand the scope of these novels, allowing us to see events that Millhone doesn't, and for us to know more about what is going on than the protagonist does. This allows for suspense, as we worry about Kinsey getting into situations that we know may be dangerous.
I'm so happy to make a custom piece for a gallery. In this case it's a requested image that I don't normally use in this style earring. These custom earrings are headed out to Mary Lou Zeek Gallery in Salem, Oregon! (The earrings are reversible - hence the two sides shown!)
You drink the Kool-Ade. I drink from the fountain of truth and wisdom. And Mountain Dew and Red Bull.
At anytime if your pan begins to dry out add a bit of your wine and chicken stock mixture.
I promise, next time, to stay away longer. Or, at least, to have more interesting meals to write about.
My mom makes this excellent peanut noodle salad that I have yet to get the recipe for. This is a close second, but still I want that recipe. I will write it on my to-do list which has grown frightful in length.
And we did not doubt it.
and we are not allowed to say what we think about them.
Reading this verster
Last year seemed to have more than it's fair share of castles in it, not all of which have been mentioned in previous blogs. It seems a shame to get to far away from last year without giving these three, very different, castles a mention.
Dip in the melted chocolate tapping off excess. Add sprinkles and leave to cool.
But tragedy shot into their home one April morning in 1978. Dan and Ophelia were gunned down and killed in their master bedroom.
We are really proud of the collection, which represents some of the most cutting edge work on Mexicans in Texas. The authors are really pushing us to think about Texas history in a new way, asking new questions, and using fresh perspectives.
What, to passions I witness around me to-day? was the sea risen?
So you read the the rules/info? Easy breezy right? I am sooo excited to see your creations!
“The planet earth is round and revolves round the sun along with the other 9 planets”
These are not only the ‘fixed deposit’ areas, but are where many of the electoral problems are most acute, especially foreigner voters. Greater activism outside of Kuala Lumpur will illustrate that the concerns are not confined to the urban core, but national (and international) in scope.
Wherever my wheels roll through
Anyway. Picholine is one of those restaurants that offers a separate vegetarian menu. I appreciate that kind of effort; it shows that the chef has actually put some thought into a coherent set of vegetarian options, rather than just tacking some meatless entrée onto the end of a list. I actually have a bit of a problem at restaurants like this; because I’m not used to seeing several vegetarian options at each course, I have a hard time deciding what to get. Eventually I settled on the chestnut-fennel veloutte and the cauliflower “steak”.
dragging his bone home.
Now of course any supernatural tale is being compared with Stephenie Meyer, just proving there’s nothing new under the sun.
HW – Joel Theriault (1-0) def. Shawn Pauliak (0-5) via KO (punches) at 0:21 of Round 1.
I admit I have all kinds of biased and narrow minded opinions about what it means to be an artist, to make art, to be part of the art industry and “community”. I’m an enlightened bigot. I’m also vain and egotistical, but enough with the self-awareness, I mean self-consciousness. This blog is about getting better, man.
The system within your body that regulates blood pressure and fluid balance is also involved in bone health. It appears as though a high sodium intake increases the elimination of calcium through the urine. This in turn causes calcium to be leached from the bone with the attending bone loss and increased risk bone fractures. It’s well known that reducing the salt intake has a positive effect on the bodies calcium balance. For this reason, a low-sodium diet may help slow the progression of age-related bone loss. Not only is the skeletal system adversely affected by high sodium, so are your kidneys.
"The blogger who caught this little scene-setting Hari lie in 2009 made Guido laugh, it dates back to the 2009 Copenhagen Climate Conference:
Together we pray the words to teach
As soon as I hit the vinyl seat of my truck I screamed, bounced off the top of the cab and maybe pissed myself a little. The kind of pain where you have a back spasm so bad you can't breathe. I had my annual sunburn.
For me… whatever works to you keep you fools from getting your hands on power and screwing this country up beyond all hope !!
Modern society almost demands that you be a drone. Children’s games are outlawed because someone might get hurt. Score isn’t kept at kids sporting events because “everyone is a winner”; well everyone is also a loser. Everyone is the same, and that’s the way society wants it. Getting hurt is an easy way to learn. Losing, and not liking losing, is a reason to get better. Why get better if it doesn’t matter what you do, since there is no score? Kids are all treated the same. Which is bullshit. Everyone needs to be treated differently. I am different than you, you are different than her, she is different than him. If they are all treated the same, how will we know who does what good?
How wonderful the little connections that pile up in the day to day. Blanco has long had an interest in the German expressionist painters of the early twentieth century, and was interested to learn, while reading about them the other day that Caspar David Friedrich, the great Romantic painter of lonely figures cast against majestic landscapes, was resurrected by the expressionists after falling into obscurity during the latter part of his life (when he was deemed ‘half-mad’) and after his death in 1840. (Friedrich was also taken up by the Nazis, as embodying the concept of heroic individualism, but he can hardly be blamed for that, and would, in any case – had he lived in the 1930s and 40s –have been incarcerated by them as a madman.)
I had a break from sewing while we were away. I didn't even take a small hand sewing project so I'm raring to get back into it. The question is what to do next?
School/work/life/blahblahblahboring.
We actually have room for one more 4x8 plot... if I am daring I'll add that in a week or two.... or next year.
Jesus forgives all of our sin
Thus, one more Merrick story.
Another note that while it is possible to sync upward (phone to Google), it’s not always successful. Syncing downwards is often flawless. However, If you are a berry user, you might receive an error message that there is an error in syncing. To fix this, the best way that I think and also tried is to wipe out your contact list and start syncing again. In my experience, it never fails.
As I helped Beloved check out, I stuck out my hand and said, "as one fellow New Orleanian to another, I'm glad you've decided to make your home here."
Poor reviews aren’t nice either. Taunting the Dead is a controversial book. The main character does something that most readers can sympathise with because I feel it makes her human. But some readers have said they don’t believe she would act like that or even that she shouldn’t have acted like that. It’s good to evoke controversy, though.
Takoyaki is a traditional Osaka dish. E is from Osaka and she was keen to introduce this meal to us. It consists of a batter with added ingredients (such as grated ginger, prawns pickles ... but most especially, octopus) placed on to the top of the battered rounds as they cook in the special electric pan (as featured in the photo above). E biked to the shop to buy some fresh octopus pieces. Meanwhile Steve was entrusted to get the tokoyaki started.
Today’s playlist, and maybe a couple more in the days to come, is coming to you from an old “mix tape” I pulled out and plugged in to my rusty old, beaten up pickup truck’s cassette player on Monday afternoon as I was driving around.
So what the fuck---oh, there's that word again---descriptive----so what the fuck does your star sign have to do with who or what you are.
Perfectly paced and sparkling with wit, DELILAH AND THE DARK STUFF has mystery and an engaging new character in lonely, grungy Delilah with her dreadlocks, Doc Martens and knowledge of witchcraft. Delilah's stepfather, 'the Loathsome Verne', is a manic Puritan who forces repressive energy-saving economies on his family and forbids almost all aspects of modern life. But there is also a shadowy presence stalking the girls: Matthew Hopkins, Witch-Finder General. The action moves from north London to the depths of Shropshire, where Hopkins' power increases. It's far too funny to be truly frightening, but there is gruesome historical detail of how alleged witches used to be trussed and ducked.
Steve Keen: Predicting A London Credit Crisis As An Introduction To Modern Economics
Thankfully, that owl reminded me who He really is. He could make all of the problems go away, but a clay jar that has not been through the fire will never be of any use to anyone. He knows that we have such short memories, and so he has to constantly remind us how much we need Him. In my case, he showed me the worst version of myself, and when I ran from it, I ran into Him.
(They had 5, 10, and 15 year paint. I went for the 15, not doing this again soon.) James is 15 now.
Not wanting the folks over at Strong Memorial Hospital to think I'd forgotten about them at the holidays, though, I decided to mosey on over there two days after Christmas. Just to say hello. And as long as I was there, maybe they could take a wee peek at my abdominal cavity to check out why I was having severe pains that wouldn't go away.
We don't need to listen to experts who warn against being "too attuned" to our children. If we truly are attuned to our children, then we are listening to and understanding and responding to their needs.
I had a terrible job during the summer of 1995. I worked for a factory that made hydraulic cylinders by the thousands and I was assigned the job of making a small part called a “port” for those cylinders. I was at my own station with four different metal working machines, a large fan, and a whole lot of grease and metal shavings. The job was not difficult to perform for either the intellect or the body, but it took a heavy toll on my sanity. Blessed with an active imagination, I found that my working environment constituted a drudgery of experience that was difficult to bear for my mind. As I mechanically worked each port to completion I would disappear into a world entirely different from the one in which my body stood like a meat robot cycling through its operating program. In that world there was sunlight, romance, adventure, freedom, and not a hint of the smell of coolant fluid, or the sound of screaming machines. This pattern sustained me for a while, but soon the lack of stimulation began to stunt my imagination and all I could think about was how miserable I was. Just when things were truly turning ugly though, I was given a stimulus for my mind that helped me make it through the summer. It wasn’t a drug. I hadn’t fallen in love. I had not purchased some wonderful new object to entertain me. What was this wonder that had saved my mind from either sinking into despair or turning into oatmeal? Nothing more, and nothing less, than a good story. The story of William Wallace.
The choices you make today will have an impact of some kind. Your life is about so much more than you. Your life is about so much more than today. Your life counts for far more than you can see right now.
I personally want the yeti too.
Thus the Chinese-Malay polarity vis-à-vis Bersih is not a physical manifestation but lies more in the mindset and was most tellingly illustrated by the spat between the DAP vice chairman and the party secretary-general.
pretending all the while,
Along with the Chair appointment, two further lecturer posts are proposed, dealing with the history and culture of the Middle East more broadly.
Next was the research and the realization that buying an Italian sportbike is not a great idea for a daily commuter. The Ducati was hard to pass on but it's the opposite of the barcalounger and close to the head first luge. A few weeks ago I took a little roadtrip and looked at lots of bikes and think I've settled on this.
And it is so bizarre to watch. Especially through my point of view, standing in the middle of my incredibly cute little life, with the husband and the cat and the job and the fulfilling hobbies and the parents who love me. I look at him, and I see someone who hasn't lost the will to live, exactly. More like he's lost the recipe to life. He keeps adding salt when he should be adding sugar, and he repeats this same mistake over and over again until the cookies taste like absolute shit and that's when I finally realize, "this is a disease."
I also want to spell out here again that the “go ahead” that is talked about is not the ability of someone else to say “go”. Ironically enough that go ahead is deceitfully gained from the victim. What is commonly understood here is this. “If they are a criminal with a loaded gun and a key to my house then they can kill me”. In the mind that constitutes permission! As incredible as it sounds the reality is that what we hold in mind with conviction is the potent force. We have been lead to believe that someone else can just do x, y or z. They can’t. One of the real problems here is fear itself. In its early stage, fear makes us highly perceptive but at the same time far less discriminative. The reason is that the brain rationalizes its fuel resources and gives priority to those areas that need the most fuel. But that is not all. Our attention is focused on finding evidence, thus we are not in a thinking mode. Indeed in intense fear where the source of the danger has not or cannot be determined the thinking area of the brain (the executive function) remains inoperative while the person waits for information in order to determine what to do next. Thus that early stage of fear is a blind spot. However when you know this you can voluntarily invoke the executive function back into action, maybe not always fully, but enough.
As with D and I, Larry and Magic became friends almost unintentionally. Amazingly, all it took was one sparked conversation to solidify a lifelong friendship. With the most important people, that’s all it takes. But even after their initial bond was cemented, their interactions remained strained. They were impossibly different in some ways, were still both competing for the same dream, were still wary of each other.
However, Afrika said that the poor were not unreasonable and wanted to know whether Shiceka would like his head to fall into basket lined with silk or one lined with velvet when their patience finally ran out and they guillotined the kleptocrats.
Following this post, I will be proposing a Marxist model of consciousness that will have a greater implication for discussion and mental health relating to work and life stress management but that is for another time. Feel free to comment below, I look forward to any comments.
Because of the elements of inverted totalitarianism, inherent within the structure of corporate state capitalism, and internalized within the general population by constant, commercial media re-enforcement, one should not be surprised when a sizable portion of the general populace is inclined to support police state tactics to quell social unrest among the disadvantaged of the population.
Yet here tonight in the mellow light
Two days ago we did our first Mother's Day activity (yay).
This question occurred to me yesterday evening when I closed a book about 200 pages (not quite half way) in and said, "I'm done." This morning, I decided I would skim ahead a little to see if what irritated me enough to stop reading the book would be swiftly rectified and the plot advanced in a non-irritating direction, but yesterday I was ready to put it down and never pick it up again. I realized, too, that what pissed me off so much this time was the same thing that had pissed me off a while back in another book that I put down and have never picked up since: a broken promise. I don't mean something trivial like "I know I promised to leave you the last piece of cheesecake, but I ate it anyway". I mean a heavy-duty promise that is part of the foundation of the story being told. In the previous case, it was a promise one MC made to himself. He did that, and I said, "You suck. You're an idiot. Why should I read about you any more? I'm done." (Of course, I didn't like the other MC anyway, so it was that much easier to walk away.) In this case, it was a promise between the two MCs, and one is trying to be noble and clever and protective by breaking it. Uh...no. Stupid and intolerable, IMO. I had no idea broken promises bugged me so much, but there does seem to be a pattern emerging, doesn't there.
When he glanced into the rearview and noticed Audrey seething at him, he sighed. “Don’t worry your pretty little head. I’ll get you there, Princess. Deal? Okay. Deal.”
In just a couple of years, even as someone who is still, according to some sections of the public a “reviled tranny”, I can feel myself fitting, adapting, working so, so much more productively.
Keldeo is the second 5th gen event legendary (after Victini). It’ll be the star of the next Pokemon movie, titled “Kyurem VS The Sacred Swordsman – Keldeo”. No event details yet, but will likely be a wi-fi event.
Brycen loves to pretend like he's talking on the phone. He has a toy cell phone that he loves to play with, but he also uses the nunchucks for the Nintendo Wii as phones. Today he was using the plug in for my blow dryer as a phone. He'll start his "conversation" by saying, "Awo? (hello)", and then for those who are ever around him, he starts talking his fluent jibberish. Every now and then we hear a familiar word in the conversation. It's so funny what kids pick up on!
Craftilicious x
So, I have 3 2 lb packages of bees to place in their respective homes. Last Monday, that is exactly what my mentor/friend and I did!
I wonder … do you know what you would really do if you found out your lover was having an affair? Would you leave? Are you sure? If you stayed, would you be ashamed to tell your friends and family what he’d done? I can’t wait to hear, and thank you so much for reading!
I have been waiting for you all year. I kept telling myself that if I could make it to November it would all be "smooth sailing" from here. No pun intended...okay, maybe a little pun!
P.S.S.S….. Be sure to subscribe to my blog and never miss a post! Enter your email address and then check your email to confirm subscription.
The rumour mills are running rampant with speculation that J.S. has given birth but, is taking her time in announcing it.
Finally, Hook and Ladder No. 10 of State Street arrived, but the firemen botched it. They underestimated the distance to the window and didn’t park the ladder beyond the curb, close enough to the building. When they lengthened the ladder it didn’t reach the window.
Two weeks later
But if you love this sort of thing -as I do, with all my heart - then enjoy. And I love "Eponine."
hello, scrappy friends!
Apparently there are none.
This is a paradise for any music lover.
Calla & I sat together at the kitchen counter and watched Dad create a Spanakopizza for our 2nd Wednesday night meal. The perfect collision of the creamy spinach & feta spanakopita, but left open faced and topped with olives, tomatoes and parmesan cheese. Then served with tzadziki on the side. This he says, was ‘made with love for my girls’, what a great guy!!
IPKat readers should enjoy this quote by Suzanne Scotchmer in her book, “One of the things that economists have difficulty explaining is why disputes ever reach the courts.” Two opposing parties with relatively the same amount of information (via disclosure) should have reasonably close expectations of the outcome of court case. Settlement is a logical outcome as it allows for the parties to avoid the expense of litigation. In practice, we know that a good deal of cases reach court.
However, having said that, I would say that in the modern mind, most people associate spectacular violence of any kind with the "genre" popularly called "action-adventure." In Yvonne Tasker's introduction to her academic collection ACTION AND ADVENTURE CINEMA, she cites one Larry Gross as having coined the term "the Big Loud Action Movie," which essentially applies to anything with lots of things blowing up or people beating up other people (or monsters beating up monsters, superheroes/supervillains, etc.) But as my insistence on applying the Fryean mythoi ought to make clear, I don't think violence alone, or even violent combat, qualifies a given work to be deemed "adventure."
Quite clearly this is Blackpool, Lancashire and not New York, New York and therefore I can't be accused of somehow cleverly following up on the still from the 1912 film "The New York Hat" which served as the theme photo this week. Equally, charming though Uncle Frank's mother undoubtedly was (I regret to say that I never had the pleasure), nobody would suggest that she was as beautiful as the young Mary Pickford (yes, it was she in the theme photograph). So, there you are, a completely random and non-thematic photograph ...... which just, by chance, seems to feature rather a lot of hats.
That's all we had talked about together.
2/3 cup sliced green onions
butter or oil
I remember my fear back in May, driving out west, seeing the poor roads without shoulders in Northern Ontario. I remember stopping at a picnic area in Saskatchewan off the Trans Canada. I stepped outside the vehicle and felt a fierce wind from the east. I was rattled. I hadn’t thought too much about getting headwinds in the prairies; not until that moment. I was scared of being clipped by a trailer. I was scared of not making my distances in the prairies, and getting so far behind that I would have to hop in the support vehicle to make events; and not truly cycling across the country. But we humans are adaptable creatures. When you’re feeling safe in a car, and you feel the wind from trucks whizzing by you in the opposite direction on the two lane highway, it’s easy to think: “a cyclist would be doomed on this road”. Once I was cycling on these roads, I realized that the shoulders were wider than they looked from driving, the truck drivers were usually quite considerate, and when they did pass close the gust could be harnessed to help me accelerate.
This morning the sea was a grayish blue, very dark and stormy. Now the sun is out, but we are still rocking. The sea is a royal blue.
Giving evidence in Huntley's initial application, Lara said the South African police were "corrupt" and in "cahoots with the criminals".
I walked him to his car. After all, while everything had been cheapened to some extent, we did share 8 years together. I had decided earlier that we would all remain friends. She also deserved her happiness that I had obstructed for so long. The next time I see him, he would be the boyfriend of my best friend. At least, I would not lose her.
This had the early lead in the beginning, but is sinking fast with the latest going ons.
A handful of pain-Better than raw
One of the greatest problems that exist for movie sequels, is will the sequel be able to catch the same magic that the original movie did? As we all know there are many reasons why a movie sequels fail the key reasons being that some key actors did not reprise their roles or that there was no new sense of urgency to drive the plot forward. All though tragically Brittany Murphy was unable to reprise her role as Gloria in Happy Feet 2 fortunately the only noticeable difference between Brittany Murphy and Pink’s portrayal of Gloria was their singing style.
Pugs are supposed to be difficult dogs to train to do tricks. Charlie (the pug) learned a lot of tricks.
In the year 2455, Rowan and Jason's frozen corpses are discovered by a field trip of intergalactic pupils and their teacher. The Earth has become dangerously polluted and now humanity lives on another planet. The kids and their teacher take the Jasonsicle and the Rowansicle back to their spaceship and set sail for outer space. Both Rowan and Jason make a full recovery. In Rowan's case, this means shivering and pouting a lot. In Jason's case: killing nubile teenagers.
Spells:
I never imagined I would feel this sad.
Native Vote, is a nation wide resource for encouraging voter turn out in Indian Country. Organized by the National Congress of American Indians, get out the vote efforts in Indian Country have been supported by NCAI since 1955.
also, popina is offering 15% off everything on their site with the code rockstar!
Considerable food for thought there
That life isn’t to be lived in the future
Failure is not an option.
For you life a higher purpose in life is was really was meant to be.
8 TBS golden caster sugar
On his first day, he gathers the creative department together to give them a rousing speech, and a taste of his uncompromising new regime.
To listen very very loud!»
Princess Victoria: Constantly. I see them leaning in and moving me around the board.
Ultimately, of course, none of this has anything to do with the climate. Any rational human being, and even the irrational ones on the left, knows well enough that there have always been variations in the climate. In recent decades these variations have been minor and benign compared to changes that have taken place in the recent geologic past (for example, the Great Ice Age).
The problem, as I'm sure every review has pointed out, is that the TMD only works on certain highlighted objects. That makes sense - you wouldn't want to fall through the floor every time you accidentally tapped the bumper - but it does lead to some incredibly constrained puzzle design. If I was stumped for more than a few seconds at any point during Singularity, I don't recall it. The level design is not so much bad as just remarkably uninspired. The ability to manipulate time should be a selling point, allowing the player a wealth of creative opportunities. Instead we get the same tired set of interactions over and over. So I suppose time is being manipulated, in the same way it was for Bill Murray in Groundhog Day.
11/7/2008 - Winnipeg, MB - Burton Cummings Theatre
June 20 Washington, DC @ 930 Club
1/4 cup red wine grapes, halved and de-seeded
I could hardly stay away. Several times a day I would look at the cam. Was Mom there? Did she have food? How long had she been sitting like that? Where's Dad? Is he OK? How are those little ones...especially the littlest one. I yearned to see 3 Little heads every time I turned on the camera. I read to see if they had all gotten something to eat. I hated it when it was cold and rainy and loved it when it was warm and sunny. I especially loved it when I knew the Little one had gotten its belly full.
EPO Examiners usually apply the exclusion of surgical methods from patentability broadly, so that taking a sample from a body, or administering via injection, or even by particles, can lead to objections. In many case the objection can be overcome by excluding the relevant step from the claims, but clearly for certain inventions this might not be possible.
I finally MOSTLY baby-proofed my porch, so we are good out there and I can watch him there from the kitchen or laundry room, but I really want to make more of the house accessible to him so that I don't have to watch him every second. The living room is sort of okay, and our bedroom is nearly baby-proofed, but the rest of the house needs to be done.
Ashes: This short story was actually written by author C.M. Eddy, Jr., and was subsequently revised by Lovecraft (although his involvement was unknown for years, and then ignored for even more years once it was discovered). I'm taking a momentary pass on this one because it's not technically a Lovecraft story, and it's not freely and readily available. Maybe I'll come back to it later. Maybe not. Sue me. Published in the March 1924 issue of Weird Tales, after "The Hound" but before "The Rats in the Walls".
Just to show you how dense the cornfield is, here is a photo of me standing three feet inside the stalks. (I’m in the far left row. You can see the shadow of my head in the bottom left hand corner of the picture.) When I realized how impossible it would be for you to see me, I considered taking another photo. Then I remembered: Startled deer. Foxes. And who knows – maybe even another me.
Of course, no Southern Italian summer menu would be complete without the addition of sausage and peppers. There are so many ways to prepare this. My preferred method is to grill the sausage, cut them into bite size pieces and keep warm. I then sauté red or green peppers with lots of onions and garlic until tender, and combine the sausage into the mixture. At this point, you may add some tomato sauce and bake for a while – as the Neapolitans are wont to do. I keep it simple and serve as is. Nothing like it.
5. If you could change one thing about your body what would it be?
Deuteronomy 30:9-10 (NLT)
Now, I'd like to just share a few tips about icing and assembling a 3 tiered cake. I used the following chocolate cake recipe which is enough batter for 2 cakes (click here); and the top layer of my cake was made out of this Donna Hay Vanilla Cake recipe (click here).
-finally figuring out how to easily turn arms and legs for more of these little darlings.
“Love is what carries you, for it is always there, even in the dark, or most in the dark, but shining out at times like gold stitches in a piece of embroidery.”–Wendell Berry, Hannah Coulter
On to the hike.
Otherwise, "Little Man" (as I call him) has been gaining over an ounce a day since he's been home! He got a stellar review from the doctor at his 2 week appointment on Monday. She doesn't see any need to see him until his 2 month visit!
So far the court doesn’t see a problem with pension reform initiative Measure L, according to a ruling issued on Monday (May 4).
Okay, let me amend that.
George Galloway: An Analysis
So I saw David Byrne & the other heroes instead of winnetou and old shatterhand! The big point came when David Byrne jumped of the stage and begun to "dance" backwards to the audience. This was a chance for me to touch his sweatened shirt! What a feeling! The guy who went with me to the concert was a known taper in my hometown. On every fair he sold his tapes which were mostly taped by him. When I asked him if he has his recorder present, he said: " Not so important, I have all songs on official records. That´s enough for me" I began to hate him and asked me, why his girlfriend doesn´t split with such an ignorant & lazy idiot!
From the photo archives:
I realise that I should probably post an entry about The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim so people don’t think I missed it but there’s quite a few months until the release so at this point it feels really far away.
For example, your success criteria may be that the software produces specific results, has no known defects (or a small number of low severity defects), is reusable, is maintainable, is well documented, is easy to use, etc. By defining the success criteria up front, you can objectively evaluate whether the project met the criteria or not. Solicit help from all team members (project managers, product managers, testers, automation engineers, other developers, documentation specialists, etc.) when defining the success criteria. By getting a team perspective of the success criteria, you will have better and more measurable criteria and you will get much better buy-in from the team.
While I typically get branded as a liberal, I am actually a fiscal conservative: I favor lowering taxes and government expenditures to a minimal level consistent with the government fulfilling its legal and moral duties (such as defense). I am also against wasteful spending, corruption, and pork. As might be imagined, the disputes tend to get started when it comes to the matter of defining the legal and moral duties of the state.
I can't believe it's been 5 years! Five years since we flew to Guatemala and met our little princesa for the first time!
William moves into a cell with Senator James Moran, who went to jail for embezzlement. Moran says that while he's not innocent, somebody named "Harkins" is supposedly at fault for him landing in prison. Moran has smuggled yakydock into the cell, but warns William that he should find some money if ever he wants to obtain any rare goods while in prison. As part of his sentence, William is assigned the duty of shoveling coal in prison.
Life drawing is important to illustrators, not only to understand the visual anatomy of a human, but by drawing a human the behavioural actions are recorded through image. The understanding of how a person acts is more likely to stay with you through drawing them. The most successful illustrators also understand and engage with empathy, being in touch with the child in themselves. Therefore when writing, they are more likely to understand how it would be received.
Publisher: Sterling Children's Books
I awoke only with a small headache this morning. ;-) But a much bigger feeling of being loved. Love that will carry me surely into my next decade and into my next 30.
Mile 6: A nice gentle rain on a hot day. Sweet.
2 1/4 c cake flour*
Inspired by Jane Austen’s Persuasion, For Darkness Shows the Stars is a breathtaking romance about opening your mind to the future and your heart to the one person you know can break it.
Born Pierino Ronald Como in Canonsburg, Pennsylvania, Perry Como is a well-loved Italian-American crooner with a string of hits in the 40's and 50's.
3. Assistant to Small Business
Ada Brownell, a retired newspaper reporter is author of two books, chapters in five books, and 275 articles and stories in Christian publications. Her latest book is Swallowed by LIFE: Mysteries of Death, Resurrection and the Eternal.
5:27 AM Posted by Tiffani Lawton, OJTA
"She'll have a 40-foot wide commercial driveway and it will be well defined, so to me, that's much safer. You won't have traffic in and out of her business mixing with pedestrians standing at the corner waiting to cross over," Elrod said.
Billy Costigan (DiCaprio) is an undercover Massechusetts state trooper within the criminal outfit of Boston mob boss Frank Costello (Nicholson). Costello is patron to Colin Sullivan (Matt Damon), a state trooper serving the crook as a willing client. Costigan and Sullivan weave around each other like a double helix joined by their dual affiliations to both Costello and the Massachusetts State Police (Mark Wahlberg, Martin Sheen, and Alec Baldwin).
1 progress
sorrow's home
The venue is just 12 minutes walk from Piccadilly Gardens, 5 minutes from Victoria train station or just 2 minutes walk down Blackfriars Street, off Deansgate (across from the bottom of Market Street/St Mary’s Gate).
I have certain things in life that are super important to me: relationships, family, job, faith, friends. Those are probably my top five. But every day… week.. month… through every season of life, these things move around in order of importance. Lately, relationships have been consuming my time as I’m trying to mend broken ones. Eight months ago, my job was my first priority since I was flopping around like a fish out of water.
TRUE LOVE NEVER ENDS…..you can be poor,you can be rich, ugly,fine, fat,thin, tall or short all these does not matter because there is somebody to love you dearly for who you are!!
I like to go to bed at 9. If I’m not asleep by 12 I just say, screw this, and I get up and write, usually till two. Those are some pretty wild nights because that’s when I write with reckless abandon. I keep going until my brain, and Aric are satisfied with the work. I go until I can’t hold the pen up anymore. Poor Aric, when I don’t sleep, he doesn’t sleep either. We work together…always.
Thanks to everyone for playing! Of course after reading all of your top three movies, I realized how many I had overlooked. So. Many. Movies.
The canned goods are low
At the check-in desk, your luggage is scanned immediately in a purpose-built area. Sela plays devil's advocate – what if you have escaped the attention of the first four layers of security, and now try to pass a bag with a bomb in it?
First of all, thank you to Gillian for inviting me to a do a blog post. When she asked me I was completely stumped as to what to write about. I didn’t want to talk about myself, I mean really, what’s to know? I juggle as we all do, in my case with children, day job and writing.
Thank You, God for reminding me through a song to look for You in my husband's eyes. I'm giving you all my love and I won't give up.
Which brings me to quadcopters. These things are amazing! I'm sure Da Vinci probably had a super-secret folio of designs that included this four-propellered dream, but no one has yet to come forth with the sketches. His art on the subject is not on google. Tons of others are, though. 335,000 to be more exact.
and for working its way through processes
Brandon Holstein: Oh yeah? How did you get to meet him?
· American Society of Landscape Architect's, Maryland Chapter, Presidents Award, December, 1999
When I am behind the harp playing, I enjoy every note, every single phrase. Revisiting this music from The Light and The Lady has been a beautiful, sentimental trip down musical memory lane. I'll tell you more in the next post about that recording experience 11 years ago, that music, that concept, that consuming project that started my recording career.
During the summer holidays, Kate an RDA rider, has been coming to the centre every week for a lesson. She always likes to ride Spotty. Unfortunately, I was not there a few weeks ago when she fell off him, but thankfully she escaped with only a few bruises. Apparently, Kate was playing a bean bag game (putting bags into pots on poles) in the lesson, and she caught her stirrup on the pole. As Spotty walked forward the pole fell and hit him on the back. He bolted again.
It is a wondrous mystery that each human being is composed of body, mind, and soul. We simply do not exist as a whole human being if even one of these components is missing.
So my New Years wish to you all, my lovely readers, is this.
I have a chronic skin condition myself but I personally wouldn`t use them in this way - this feels a bit creepy to me.
In the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit. Amen.
Don't worry, I'm still very much devoted to scrapbooking. In fact, I used a recipe card stamp of mine on one of my current painting projects. Yup. I painted the stamp and placed it in the center of a series of plates I'm working on:
Stephanie Christie / Niue / 84
Sunday Used to be Prime Ad Time
Imagine if you can a world where people have assumed their natural talents were no big deal, and never attempted to hone and cure them. What if Albert Einstein, Beethoven, Michael Jordan, Frank Lloyd Wright, Dame Judy Dench, Shakespeare, Martin Luther King Jr., Christopher Columbus, Joan of Arc, Steve Jobs, Bill Gates or Steven Spielberg had turned away from their natural talents assuming that they were no big deal and that anyone could do it? Where would our world be right now?
I tried to make a mini display cake for the Daruma dolls turned bride & groom figurines. Daruma dolls are sold with both eyes blank. You fill-in one eye in when you set a goal/wish, and fill-in the other when the goal is attained. During the reception, Jun & David filled in the second eye.
Firstly I'd just like to say hello to my new followers: Joanne, Bunny, Sarah, Helen and Berit - thanks for stopping by my blog!
“And you think I don’t know that?” He argued.
Law #3: If a bad guy has unrestricted physical access to your computer, it’s not your computer anymore
Anyway, hope everyone had a great thanksgiving!
I truly believe that the tournament will be a great success. Fans will come from all over the world and be treated well by Brazilians. They will encounter a great climate in a beautiful country, populated by welcoming locals, and they will have an unforgettable experience.
The idea came to me while I was trying to figure out what to do for Saturated Canary's Challenge #5. This challenge is AnyThinG GoeS!!! Just create what inspires you. What inspires me right now??? Well, Christmas presents, of course!!! To be specific, my baby girl's Christmas presents :-)
This year has by far out done any year before this, more customers, more vendors, more great junk and a collection of some of the most creative people from around the country!
Because the next day when we were all sitting on my friend's bed playing cards (yes, the friend who'd turned the lights on), guess what slithered out of her mattress. That's right kids...the real snake had been in HER bed the whole night.
We have walls in our homes… some painted bright cheerful colors… some with paneling (yep… still have some of those)…. some with very ornate wall papers…. and some painted just a basic white…
11. DJ Quik - The Book of David
I made sandwiches.
I promised the to show you some if the treasures (treasures to me anyway:) that I found over the weekend at the flea Market. I didn't get all this there..but I had to show you some of my favorite things old and new. This is just a mix of things...but I love the colors. I've never been so into COLOR as I have been lately. ( at least in my kitchen and studio). The yellow Pyrex on the top shelf was one I got that last time we were junking. The big blue mixing bowl isn't old ..but it's my favorite set. It's the largest of the set, and has a orange, yellow and green, in graduated sizes inside. If it ever breaks, I don't think I'll ever be able to bake again. I use it ALL the time.
My grandfather, on the contrary, and despite his life’s persistent theme of hardship, took a great and present delight in the modest good that was at hand: in his place and his affection for it, in its pastures, animals, and crops, in favorable weather.
Meanwhile, in the UK military spending is around £40 billion ($60 billion). A further £3 billion was set aside by the Treasury for the war in Iraq. An extra £330 million was set aside for additional domestic counter-terrorism measures – which translates as locking up Arabs in a paranoid and illegal fashion.
5. Let each person know they have been tagged by leaving a comment on their blog.
In 1925, Haiti was lush, with 60% of its original forest covering the lands and mountainous regions. Since then, the population has cut down an estimated 98% of its original forest cover for use as fuel for cookstoves, and in the process has destroyed fertile farmland soils, contributing to desertification.
Two nights ago, I received a startling phone call at 12:54 a.m., from my dear husband, who had gotten stuck in the middle of a snow drift, about a mile away from home, after working a 12 hour shift, fixing snow plows that keep the roads passable, during a snowstorm that dumped 8 inches on us, with 30 to 40 mph winds.
Begin by accepting life as it comes and not wasting time trying to control it.
My lucky number is 9. Guess what - 9, 19, 29 & 39 will win a $5 SVG Cuts Gift Certificate!
Greystoke: the Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes (P.H. Vazak)
I was finding myself having one of those black holes of recipe inspiration. It's a viscious cycle sometimes. I can't think of any new ideas for recipes, I panic that I will have nothing for the blog, then that makes it even harder for me to come up with new recipes.
Twitter was stormed by the tweets of Hamad Al-Naqi, a young Shiite Kuwaiti man who is known for his support to the Bahraini revolution. Al-Naqi was accused of insulting Prophet Mohammed and one of his wives, Ayesha.
Accept and vow not to touch the mince pies? Warn everyone else not to touch the pies? Pretend to eat a pie but secretly drop it behind the book displays?
In fact, come to think of it,
Dakota posted: " that awkward time when you just have to slap a hoe "
Out of the mid-wood's twilight
So I thought if I concentrate on producing them first, then they will definitely be ready whenever I can borrow the car and go to Aberystwyth.
Both linked here:
1986(6), above, and in Item B-4, above, pp. 124-35, 319-21 (1989).)
In theory these keep well for around 4-5 days, in an airtight container – in this household they probably won’t manage that long!
Class war
Confession time! When I was making my cake layers I didn't adequately grease my pans and so when I tried to get both layers out which are then to be cut into 2 more layers my cake kinda, sorta, completely fell apart. It was a mess. Determined to put it together I pressed on but it was in no way blog worthy to look at. So I have pinched Mels picture from her blog so you can drool over that.
‘I think he’s amazing and I think you can relate to him because he’s made mistakes.’
Truth be told, I struggled as to how to carry out this mission. Reading the previous mission reports, I wanted to do something different, but eventually realized that if I didn't start, I'd be just over-thinking things, knowing that I just had to go out there and see what happens. So I did this past Saturday night.
It's labeled as a horror movie, even though Clive Owen has come out saying "It's your typical kind of horror film". The first half of the film would be the perfect formula for a classic horror movie. Faceless creater sneaks in a childs room in the middle of the night to steal their face. If it went the typical horror film route, it would have ended with something like the child's story came to life via their imagination and they had to somehow physically defeat this monster. That's the direction I thought it was going, but it kind of threw me for a loop in the end. The ending was disappointing in the sense that everything that was happening was not actually happening (if you look at it the way I did) so it means the characters were never in any physical danger. However, I appreciate the ending at the same time because it didn't go the cliched route. Was it an amazing ending? No. Was it completely original? Nope. But still managed to surpass my personal expectations which I liked.
Shahi paneer is a restaurant favorite, and is rich in cream, nuts, paneer, tomato and spices or simple version with yogurt, cashew nuts, paneer, tomato and spices. I tried yogurt version. Shahi means royal, and was usually found in royal kitchen (Especially of Mughal emperors’). Last time when I visited Noida, I found they add paneer in everything as variety of vegetables are scare in Northern part of India as compared to Southern part. Furthermore every place has its own culinary specialties. If you make shahi paneer it is good with Chapathi, Nan or Poori. I decide to make Poori with them. They tasted great. You can have it once in a month. I looked
When you went out to lunch with your fellow workers, did you have to pack a diaper/juice/extra outfit for them? Did you have to wipe their faces? Smile an apology and leave an extra tip for the waiter on their behalf?
So until then....
Tuesday – 1st May.
All the heat wasn’t in the sprints though. The men’s 10,000 meters saw Kenenisa Bekele look like the runner of old as he flew to a WL 26:43.18 to lead seven men under 27:00! One of those was Galen Rupp who took down the AR with a sizzling 26:48.00 in third place – signaling that he is ready for prime time. Also moving up on the all-time list of American middle distance runners was Morgan Uceny who won the 1500 in a WL 4:00.06 – just missing breaking the 4:00 barrier and becoming the 6th fastest American woman ever. Uceny did it in what has been her typical fashion – running back in the pack on the first couple of laps; moving up on the third lap to the 6th position passing the bell; making a major move down the backstretch to move into a contending position, then attacking around the final bend and sprinting off the turn to victory down the final stretch. I don’t say things like this often, but I have no doubt that if not for the fall she would have won Daegu gold – and in my first prediction for 2012 she is my London favorite.
Fees are non-refundable
Brushing perceptions of the decor aside, we remained hopeful the meal would be fantastic, given the mouth-watering descriptions and the impressive pedigree of Chef Akira Hirose, and the fact that the restaurant was filled to capacity on a Thursday night.
Around the corner and I’m straight into Screen 4, the smallest auditorium, with the ultra comfy seats we’ve come to expect from Picturehouse Cinemas and ample leg-room. Initially I sit at the very front, disconcertingly close to the screen and move hastily to the back row, which sits under an overhanging projection booth – quickly deciding this is my favourite seat. If I tell you that I’m usually a middle-middle kinda guy, you might get some idea of just how cosy Screen 4 must be. Obviously the cinemas are all still in varying states of completion, so I disregard the odd unattached speaker, but the strange flashing on the side walls whenever the screen is showing white or light colours is a little disconcerting.
~ If you link your creation to any online gallery, please use the keyword 2TC2
Put this on FB this morning.
Whale sharks have no teeth but their mouths are enormous grottos! I am so surprised by the bravery of West Coast fisherman going out on their small boats!
Illuminated. On fire. Metamorphosing every second. So bright my eyes ache and water. I blink twice and they've both moved out of the direct light and the effect is gone. But the image is burned into my retinas.
It's 1907, and the old fashioned, small theater is almost dead. Bigger, more extravagant theaters, owned by large partnerships are squeezing out the small guy. Pepper, however, blames much of their failures on Stanley. When she finds out the owner's son is returning, her hopes grow. Before Robert was suddenly shipped away to school, Pepper and Robert were romantically involved. She has hopes that not only will his return cause the theater to be successful once again, but also that their romance will continue, as Robert promised.
Rnds 7+8) repeat rnd 6
61. Mooned/flashed someone?
Note: If you live in the Southern hemisphere then we think that the sight of a sweet pea would definitely help a grey January day over here. I promise not to feel too grumpy if you post images of sunny beaches and summer dresses.
5. What object is closest to the viewer? How did the artist make it appear so?
The US’s policy toward Rhodesia was slightly more nuanced, given that it equated African majority rule with Marxism. But once Jimmy Carter came to power, Marxism was no longer an impediment to mobocracy. The US joined the UN, Britain and the rest of the international community in a commitment to ensconce that sexy freedom fighter, Mugabe. The rest is history—as is post-colonial Africa.
Somewhere, we are taught that men want someone to tend to them. That our responsibility as women is to make sure that the man is okay because if he isn’t okay then the house isn’t okay. Well, the man might be the head of the household, but I am very well aware my mother, and most women I know, are the neck and when the heck has a knot it is very difficult to make anything work properly. Including the head.
WHITE + TEAL + CHIPBOARD
Try it and let me know what you think!!!!
Opening the jumbo sausage roll, one gets a firm meatiness that lingers awaiting washing down with lagery goodness. Usually one goes for the economy sausage rolls, offering a far better sausage roll bang per buck, but today we are at the premium end of the sausage roll spectrum and all the better it is too. Thankfully it is not organic or anything, just a decent amount of pork goodness in a light and delightful puff pastry shell.
8 Spinner 2:54 X
A direct threat to the health of millions worldwide is being hyped by the media, continuing the anti-science, anti-fact, and pro-illness agenda of environmental organizations to ban BPA, a chemical that protects against food-borne disease and increases the safe use of all plastic containers.
6) I have to move out, because soon I won't have a place to live
Yes, Baby Sofia was born on over the weekend to Nadia and her hubby!
We’ve already learned that God allows trials in our lives, and He uses those trials to bring us to spiritual maturity. He also rewards us for successfully enduring trials.
Coping With Life
When I get like this, I have to turn to a different set of NEVERs. NEVER statements that uplift me. Or at least temporarily delude my mind until my brain conjures up another round of self-defeat.
You look cute when Kairi acting like your girlfriend
On a side note, It's been a while since I've posted anything... Life has been keeping me busy... I do check my blogs often even though I rarely have time to comment or post... Xoxo to all :) and please advice!
Normally I take my vacation during the summer months. But since we went off gallivanting in Maui back in May, it means that most of the summer will find me with regular office hours.
and the water tower was saved.
I was raised on Mom, Apple Pie and the American way. As a child I still recall watching "G-Men vs Al Capone" and I pretty much grew up with the theme songs to 'Dragnet' and 'Adam-12' running through my head. The government and law enforcement were to be respected and obeyed. That isn't the case anymore.
� Project Management Reporting System
Matching thread looks best...but as you'll see I didn't for two of my cardigans. You use so little thread with this project...and I'm cheap. :)
So Long Baby Goodbye
Many of our mommies have inquired as to how they can best support Lara's family during this difficult time. Here is the information that has been shared with us by one of Lara's dearest friends:
‘Yet time after time things like this crop-up and completely ruin our credibility. It’s no wonder people are getting fed up with Griffin and divisions are splitting the party.’”
She also suggested bright blue tights under this, but again, not going to put tights on when I don't have to. Let's pretend they're there.
I found this on Chelsea's blog, which she found on someone elses, which, I am sure was found on someone elses... You know how this works. ;)
Mix all ingredients together and bring to a boil. Reduce heat until it's simmering and then let it simmer for about 1 1/2 hours, stirring often to avoid it from sticking to the bottom. The tomatoes will make the sauce really watery, so make sure you boil off some of the water.
Unfortunately, I don't have any pictures of our desserts...delicious persimmon puddings with lemon curd and macaroons from our awesome friend Jess and an assortment of cookies (the best chocolate chocolate chip cookies ever, orange thumbprint cookies) and phenomenal lemon cheesecake from Elaine. A delicious time was had by all.
Well #25 yields 235 gpm at a drawdown of 90 feet. What is the specific capacity?
Seiko Watches – Men’s Le Grand Sport Titanium Watch Model Seiko SLC033 Review
The couple split up shortly after Yasmin’s birth, and Dawn embarked on a romance with a white electrician who became the father of her twins, Amber and Ryan, now 13. The couple were together for six years, until 2006.
But at present I am sticking with lobster! I love it and I can cook it well. The lobster we ate on Easter Sunday was perfect!
We sat and chatted and talked and bonded. JUST what we needed. Especially what CPT needed. See, words love language - hehe. Who knew? Not him, apparently - LOL :) Thanks, Denim (the therapist), for helping us figure it out!
But that brings us back to the relationship between readability and quality. According to the Fallen website (hosted by publisher Random House), the series is “intensely addictive” – and I can’t deny that. I looked forward to pulling it out of my bag every afternoon on the train commute home, in the same way I look forward to the next episode of my (until now) secret soap-opera obsession, Greys Anatomy. But let’s look at that word addictive. Like sugar. Or heroin. I once heard watching television described as sitting in a lukewarm bath, which seems to fit with my experience of reading this book: you become increasingly restless and uncomfortable, but lying there is just too easy to really think about doing anything else. The question is, is that a bad thing? Is it worse than reading something so impenetrable that you get through a chapter and realise you’ve somehow been thinking about something completely unrelated the whole time?
Inspirational, right? That Julie’s a clever woman.
- “Um, yes we should!”
The word PROJECT can be defined in multiple ways. It’s both a noun and a verb. As a noun it may allude to an actual venture or undertaking that you, as an individual or with a team, desire to accomplish.
EVERY ‘HAARP RING’ From 2 Days Ago Now HIT By Tornados / Very Severe Weather! Matt Taibbi “Justice Department Has No Appetite To Take ANY Cases Against Wall Street Executives”! United States Controlled News Media! The 2002 Jenin Holocaust of Palestinians By Zionist ’666′ Israel ! Fears Grow Over Greek Debt Default Despite Bail-Out! Chinese Gold Buying Relentless! Lou Dobbs: We’re Watching A Group of Elites Who Wish to Bring About A One World Order! Tony Cartaluci: It’s Official – “Arab Spring” Subversion U.S. Funded !
Luke exhaled heavily, the sound of life and yet somehow the sound of death as well. “Kadie, I told you to wear a blue dress knowing full well you would wear green. You were always your most stubborn with me. Lucky for me, I learned all about your stubbornness early on.
It was nice having a little break from baking last week, no birthdays (none that I had to make cake for), and no other events, no last-minute thing, nothing. I did enjoy my sleep and not having to wake early to finish some cake or decorating. It wasn't too busy either at work so I could go home on time and play with my baby nephew. I did however, can't stay away for too long from baking. I made this cake last weekend just because for once, I didn't have any particular plan other than errands to do, and this cake has been on my to-try list for a while. So what's special about this cake, other than the fact that it doesn't scream Spring?
And Peter and John and all the Apostles, starting first in Jerusalem in Judea and Galilee and then to the very ends of the earth, announced the Resurrection and the Good News to everyone they encountered.
I wold love to get back to blogging and posting more often that I have been.
I sink down in the seat and my body goes stiff.
I haven't made any post yet but I will make a couple soon.
It made for some pretty photos.
I found a vintage stove on Craig's List that I would love to have for canning. We are going to look at it on Saturday. Do any of you have experience with vintage stoves? This one is a 1954 RCA Estate electric range and oven. Actually it has three ovens. The range top has two large burners and two small ones, and in the center it has a griddle with a super large burner beneath it. It's 40" wide so there is much more room for canners and pots. And I have plenty of room for it in my canning kitchen. I'll let you know if we buy it.
So here it is... our new and improved pantry.
The MSM seems reluctant to inform us how this new thought-crime of religiously aggravated harassment was contravened, but posters displayed by Conway in the windows of his home are rumoured to link the sexual consummation of the marriage between the Prophet Mohammed and his nine year old bride Aisha with the casual disregard Muslims exhibit toward the rape and grooming of underage English girls in Britain’s northern towns and cities.
As part of my team, you will get monthly newsletter,
Lemistry is a book of short stories and essays celebrating the Polish science fiction writer Lem Stanislaw. You might never of heard of him but you will know work that has been inspired by his writing. It's all over the place... in science fiction films, computer games and fiction...
“With regard to your offer,” he wrote, “I had not had the slightest intention of parting with the picture when I first saw you. But the war has hit me heavily, and with the inevitable depreciation of my investments I must confess that the opportunity to realise a little ready capital is not one lightly to be set aside. The price you mention is, I admit, generous, though, of course, you have a special interest in the possession of the picture. I have consulted my solicitor, who advises me to accept your offer. In the matter of transit, railway companies, in my opinion, cannot be relied upon at the present time. I suggest that if you are in town during the next ten days, you should take back the picture yourself – it could be packed in an ordinary suit case – and you could then at the same time make out a cheque for the sum you mention.”
Every now and again I come across a book that I have a great feeling about automatically, a book that I just truly believe is going to be one I'm going to adore. Maybe even love. And on rare occasion, I find myself let down by said book. This, for me, is what happened with Stupid Fast.
At 3:30 I am back int he kitchen to really start dinner. Making dinner seems to take longer these days as I always have helpers. If they are taller than 3 feet it's a good help, if they are shorter than that I am usually pulling him off the table and out of the cupboard while I am trying to get dinner ready.
The characters were gradually, but fully developed. The author did not tell us anything about the characters and their personalities- she showed us through their actions and words. No-one was either all good or all bad, her characters were flawed and realistic. I especially enjoyed Dan; his mood swings and behaviours made him a very believeable character. Jane Boleyn was another character I especially enjoyed; she was brilliant! The fictional characters, in both the modern and historical chapters, were realistic and well thought out.
Rueful chuckle.
Carrying on no matter what adversity we faced was our only choice. We had to continue on with our daily list of tasks. While Dan and his crew and Kurt worked the concrete that a truck had poured earlier that morning, and the crew expertly created the foundation for the shop, I kept myself busy with cleaning the trailer, again, and driving over to the Three Forks Café to pick up my order of ten cheeseburgers and ten orders of fries. I delivered the food to the hungry workers who were a whole lot grateful for the lunch break. The hours went on and on while they all worked and worked to get the concrete set before the temperature dropped below freezing that night. It was a very close call in achieving that goal, and I felt so bad for everyone who had worn themselves out all day and night while fighting a weather system that was coming in for the long haul of winter. My size 56 men’s Carhart jacket proved its worth of $100.00 as I walked back and forth from the trailer to the shop site with thermos’s filled with my magical hot cocoa made from scratch, of course, with just a hint of Tahitian vanilla. Styrofoam cups were stuffed into the deep pockets of my jacket while my gloved hands carried the thermos and a plateful of warm chocolate chip cookies that I had just removed from the trailer oven. Everyone was happy to have the hot beverage and sugar rush before they finished off the job in the wee hours of the next morning. I stood over the fire pit that Joslyn and Kurt had built in the forest garden next to the shop site and warmed myself as I marveled at the heart and soul of these people. How incredibly dedicated they all were to the idea of helping a friend and neighbor. Tears welled in my eyes, as I thought about how giving they were, no matter the challenge of beating the freeze. They worked as though this was the most important thing in the world to them and I was moved to weakness in my knees realizing the nature of these good people. It was astounding, to think that perfect strangers would care so much about Kurt and I. We were both amazed by Helicopter Dan and Tam, their daughter Manthee, Joslyn and Adam. Their hands and feet and back bones will forever be stamped into the concrete foundation and floor of our shop, along with their goodness and humanity.
Published in the October 2004 issue of Violence Against Women, it said: "In Sweden, prostitution is officially acknowledged as a form of male sexual violence against women and children.
I want to try to understand that line in the context of the book as a whole, and also to draw connections between the book and Henri Lefebvre’s…
Hey there Stampers and Friends!
Today I was up 4 pounds from my weigh in Wed morning, back up to 342.
We plan on hooping, making hoops, bbqing, chilling, garage saleing , goodwilling (yes, that is a word in my vocabulary), healthy food making, playing with leena, and generally just hanging out and talking. So you prob wont see much of me on here for the next week! Maybe though :)
your human companions
You just sit back to relax for the evening and it starts. It feels a bit like snakes crawling up and down inside your calves. Or maybe like someone has tied your muscles into knots. The only relief you can get from these uncomfortable feelings is to move your legs.
1) The first Griffith-QCA/ Memefest Award for Critical Imaginative Critical Intervention.
We have both moved to different states, but I take great pleasure in seeing updates on her ever growing career…………
Onesimus was a new creation and Paul witnessed the change in his life as he stayed with him there in his hired house and ministered unto Paul. We see that in verse 13. “In thy stead he might have ministered unto me in the bonds of the gospel.”
Key items within the Bon Appetit Collection, the first branded culinary line from the magazine, were especially popular with HSN customers including: a Seven-Quart Programmable Pressure Cooker, which sold more than 14,000 units in less than five hours airtime; a Bon Appetit Stainless Steel Pineapple Cutter, which sold more than 2,700 units in just 18 minutes airtime; and a Bon Appetit Stainless Steel/Silicon Mixing Bowl Set which sold more than 120 units per minute.
02. Ya Ma Le
“That call will take forever, just call back later when you aren’t so busy.”
Favorite color: Peacock
So even though it was hard to tell by the rain and hail outside, spring was in the air while this first card was under construction...
I woke up, and decided that, with The Preacher in Venezuela, and my youngest visiting the basketball coach at his future college, I actually could go do whatever I felt like doing...without anyone missing me.
I've never covered a film festival before, but I've been told that this is a far more relaxed kind of festival than, say, the ongoing Toronto International Film Festival (which I hope to one day attend, after plans to do so this year fell through). Hopefully, then, I'll be able to handle the pressure of pooling my impressions in a reasonably timely manner. (I'm not the only one covering the festival for The House, so I'll have some help in that regard.)
by Carl Nielsen
Breakfast would be waiting and it would be eaten under the watchful eyes of one of the aunts. A large plate filled with the fluffiest biscuits, smothered in butter and homemade jam, and lots of milk gravy. My dad taught us to cut this all up and mix it together into something he called a 'rock pile'. This dish may not have scored high points for presentation, but the flavor was there!
"The Legend of Bigfoot" is crushingly dull unless you're really REALLY into Bigfoot and nature films. And even if you're really REALLY into nature films, you're going to find yourself wishing that Marx would get to some point, or that Bigfoot would rear up and eat him. At the very least, I suspect you're going to find yourself reaching for the remote so you can scan past the boring bits. What do wild pigs have to do with Bigfoot? What do Caribou hunters have to do with Bigfoot? What do "ground squirrels in love" have to do with Bigfoot? While the ground squirrels are damn cute, they have NOTHING do to with Bigfoot, yet we are treated to scenes of all the above that seem as long as the ten years Marx supposedly hunted Bigfoot. (Oh... and what self-respecting tracker drives a red VW Bug, even if it was the Seventies? And drives it into the remote central Washington back country in the middle of winter?)
Finally, in my exhaustion I put the question to Twitter, and amid the responses of Dynasty Warriors and Minecraft I received the perfect answer: Dwarfs. It instantly resonated, and just thinking about playing the game began to alleviate my stress. I played for a solid two hours, and it was just the remedy I was looking for. But that got me thinking, why Dwarfs? What was it about this game that made it exactly the perfect choice?
Alternatively, you could just make patties. But skewers are so much more fun. Provided you have more than two and they don’t cause you to drop the beef down the grates.
It says that “But against a backdrop of noisy chatter, the bilingual group were far superior at processing sounds.
Thanks again to JM for some great reviews. Now here are a few I tried this season.
Never before have we sung more about how much we love Jesus. Never before in history have we sung more about how much God loves us. But if we’ve laid down our weapons, if we’ve given up the fight, if we’ve carefully cultivated an ignorance, a blindness, to sin — if we’ve made concession after concession to an advancing world until there’s no distinction left — if we’ve even fallen so far as to call what is evil, good and what is good, evil — then what is the truth about us? The truth about us as the evangelical church in America is, there is no grace for us. What we have, and we have it out the you-know-what, is cheap grace. And cheap grace is all presumption. There will be no heaven if we will have no war. Remember what Jesus said: “The kingdom of heaven suffers violence, and violent men take it by force.”
I'm green right now, and I'm ashamed to say it.
159. Kris was born on November 6, 1990. ± 187cm height.
Around this time of the season with real action nearing its conclusion, many fans and pundits occupy themselves with transfer rumours to pass the time. Sometimes these stories do have merit and the player makes the rumoured move to his new club. But often nothing comes of these stories and whoever was supposedly ready for a blockbuster move is left to play their trade with the same club as they did the season before.
I think it was the end of sophomore year or the beginning of junior year, I don't remember and honestly don't care, but we met at my high school's talent show. He came with his ex girlfriend and I knew her or something. Anyways, we started talking after that, then he moved from NC to the other side of the country but we started dating anyways long distance for about a year and I don't even think we saw each other once during that year.
Shaking her round bottom inside a faded house dress
All the schooled kids get tested at the end of the academic year. All of us who have to take the parità exams (some private schools have to have the pupils tested externally) take the exams a month after school is out for the summer.
Home is where love is. There is a lot of difference between a house and a home. You can get a house anywhere but to get a home you have to work hard. A home maybe anywhere no matter if its in the south pole or north pole or on the equator if there is love around you.
Would they were multitudes, and on my head
The FBI elaborated further: “Anton Dilger, a German-American medical graduate from John Hopkins University, was in Germany when the First World War broke out. He offered his services to the Kaiser, and was promptly detailed by Colonel Nicolai to do secret service work in the United States. Dilger returned to America with a supply of cultures of glanders and anthrax germs. Financed by von Papen, he set up a laboratory in Chevy Chase, near Washington, and started breeding germs on a large scale for infecting mules, horses, and cattle awaiting shipment to the allies.
Bishop-elect Alexander continued by saying, “They are very different images, the first set revelatory of the splendor of heaven, and the second of the humility, long-suffering, and charity of our Lord’s life and ministry. My first conclusion is that I must keep this difference firmly in mind throughout my life as bishop, by which I mean the glory of the liturgical iconography should have no place in my office and day-to-day demeanor. My actions, my patterns of speech, my service in short, is to be determined by the example given us by God the Word Himself.”
I've always loved Disney - so you can imagine how I nearly fell over when I went to Disney Land last year. :P I loved all the disney princesses when I was little, my favorite's being Jasmine form Aladdin and Belle from Beauty and the Beast.
Mama?
depths of Hell
I'm gonna drink it dry
A half hour later the assistant once again knocked on the door. After receiving permission to enter and saluting, he reported that there was still no response on the STUs. The commander was exasperated. “Get me the governor of Sector 127 now!” he ordered.
I've popped my middle bunny up on dimensionals and given them all glossy eyes and teeth. Martha Stewart grass border punch.
Minimum food and beverage spend $1500 during lunch and $2000 during dinner
"But if the people are no longer open to that, then the royal family will not want to undertake its political responsibilities and ... will completely withdraw from political life."
Guys and Dolls
So, there you have it for this week. Now, I want to know atleast one of your confessions for the week. Bad mom moment? Social mishap? Wifey duties left undone? No problem, spill the beans! This is a safe zone...no judgement allowed :)
'The Hunger Games' by Suzanne Collins
It is crucial to ask the questions and know the differences between artist management and artist development. Sometimes each can do both, but other companies have very specific and particular services. It is up to you to know by asking! Sometimes, it may be better to hire a music consultant or a music coach to guide you in the development you are looking for and then go to a management or booking group.
Rating: 8/10 Atkins
196 **1. “Political Philosophy of the Constitution.” Leonard W. Levy, Kenneth L. Karst, and Dennis J. Mahoney, eds., Encyclopedia of the American Constitution, vol. 3, pp. 1417-1420 (New York: Macmillan, 1986). (Preferred title: “The Principles of the Constitution”.) (Incorporated, in its intended entirety, in Item C-2000(10), below, pp. 89-97.)
I am feeling the same way at the moment in my own life, and I just want to shout at God, tell him “You’re doing it all wrong!”, “Why can’t you just sort everything out?”, or “Why them and not me?!”. I’m not in a place to actually do that, but maybe that is exactly what I need to do.
so it is cool and rainy today and i was wondering what i should
Our hotel was conveniently located right near the I-10 Freeway, allowing us to easily address prominent items on our itinerary that were in Orange County: specific landmarks in our home town of Buena Park and neighboring towns of Fullerton and La Mirada.
2. States shall consult and cooperate in good faith with the indigenous
So what’s going on? Well, as I stated earlier, this is a demonstration of well-known physics, specifically two related phenomena called electromagnetic induction & magnetic braking via eddy currents. It all has to do with the interaction between my “special planchette” (actually a powerful neodymium magnet) and the copper beneath it. Check out this Youtube video of me performing this demonstration (without the Ouija board) along with the written explanation…
When I wrote all of that...I said that when we needed the money it was there...I did NOT say it was all fundraised. We have paid for a chunk ourselves, but the truth is that we DON'T have ten thousand dollars in our bank account and that doesn't make us unfit parents. God brought us a child that we were not looking for, I have grown to LOVE and cherish the family of this very child and I know without a shadow of a doubt that he was MEANT to be in our lives. I am sure that looking on none of it makes sense. It didn't to me either. I had my doubts. I can tell you though that God has moved mountains. None of this has been us...it has ALL been Him. We are following Him and we know He will provide. If you feel that it is wrong, then you should NOT donate. I truly believe those who have generously supported us in this haven't taken it lightly...they have felt led to do so and I am so grateful, it is okay though if you disagree, not everyone is going to like or approve of the things God calls us to...it looks foolish or crazy and that is okay because at the end of the day, I only have to answer to Him. I would rather step out in obedience and risk looking foolish than sit on my hands and refuse to take the risk.
The Futura has a whole different look. At the moment, they are not particularly popular. Hard telling whether that will change or not given the myriad options for used typewriters. I've heard Futuras have shown up on TV. I wouldn't know since we watch the Olympics, Presidential addresses and weather alerts and that's about it.
to support David (2 Samuel 3:30). This is the same Joab who
Family Night = Pizza Casserole.
The calls to the vet, the doctor, dentist and all other appointments?
Or like, reading The Divine Comedy and playing Solitaire.
for all that you've given to me
C: I don’t really want to put a photo of myself up. I don’t want guys to decide by what I look like.
jury with his ferrety finesse.
I’m a wanderer in this life, I never had a home that
Kattan-the-character is surprised when he arrives in India and discovers a sophisticated industry; his director (Ali Fazal) takes him on a tour of a Bollywood studio, and Kattan is amazed at its size. Then the director mentions, gloatingly, that when Steven Spielberg needed financing for his latest deal, he came to India.
First is the Tibetan question itself. This amazing part of the world has seen so much strife over its history, and so many of its people are still scattered all over the world, not knowing whether they will ever get back to their homeland. In spite of this, Tibetans living abroad in countries like India still continue to follow their culture and their religious duties and this is apparent in Phorpa.
Coastal Scents Haul!
Back in Pierre Parte, Troy Landry is out hunting with his son, Jacob. The “YEA, YEAH YE YEAHHHHH” calls you hear across Pierre Part are easily recognizable as Troy’s ambitious call for the day’s commencement. Known as the King of the Swamp, you need subtitles just to understand the French Louisianan.
1 - 8 oz container sour cream
I came accross this quote and I love it!
SAVE THE BANDED SKYRIM FIREDRAKE!
I was asked in a formal setting why I make furniture. I have many stock answers for that, but I hesitated for a moment this last time, because it occurred to me that I was fighting a rearguard action against a determined foe, one that was beating me. The American house is being ruined, and I'm fighting a guerrilla war by trying to help people return a little soul to their homes by filling them with furniture that's got some. Half-million dollar mistakes have no reset button. You've got to deal with them.
5 The Guardian on a Saudi law to have only females work in lingerie stores. Saudi Arabia will begin enforcing a law that allows only females to work in lingerie and apparel stores, despite disapproval from the country’s top cleric. The 2006 law banning men from working in female apparel and cosmetic stores has not been implemented up to now, partly because of view of hardliners in the religious establishment, who oppose the idea of women working where men and women congregate together. Saudi women – tired of dealing with men when buying underwear – have boycotted lingerie stores to pressure owners to employ women. Law enforcement starts on Thursday.
In the United States, the president is less a leader than a manager of policies formulated by corporate elite interests. Thus there is stability of the political system, regardless of who is president. US presidents come and go, but the interests remain constant
I have so much to learn..
Flax Seed is one of the most powerful plant foods on the planet and is very high in Omega-3 essential fatty acids, Lignans, & Fiber.
I reached down and grabbed her by the back of her head
Yet you recover me from my disgrace.
8. Dont let me know when something IS wrong: If you wait until i poke my head in, and you have been bleeding out your eyes, bellybutton, etc. for the past 20 minutes, i will be upset with you. That's a reason to push your call bell. Unexpected bleeding is actually a good reason to not just push your call bell, but to yell "help!" if necessary. Please don't wait until i find you passed out!
125g butter
With Sohrab saved, Amir decides he wants to adopt him (he and his wife can’t have children), and promises Sohrab he will never send him back to an orphanage. However, Amir finds out that the easiest way to get Sohrab a visa might be to let him spend some time in an orphanage. He tells Sohrab this, and Sohrab reacts horribly. The last time he was in an orphanage he was sexually assaulted and he does not want to go back. That night, Sohrab attempts to commit suicide. Amir finds him in time and Sohrab is saved, but never the same.
As Paul refers back to his unsaved manner of life, he equates himself with his audience. He was “zealous toward God, as ye all are this day.” He could well say, “As you all are, I once was. I found it error and was converted from it.”
And why do these signs sometimes try for some cheap play on words? It’s insulting to my intelligence. Granted, we are a nation of people that need to be told to ‘click it or ticket’. Yeah.
‘He’ was a good start, he knew. He had a sister, with green eyes. And a... friend? Could eyes that hard ever be friendly? No, Dora was a friend, definitely. Not a nice one, but a friend. Just like his sister was a sister but not a nice one. Even if she did have nice hands.
You can substitute shrimp with smoked salmon pieces..
Soon
For those of you who don't care for hunting, please stick with me long enough to view Mother Nature at her weirdest moment of creativity. I'll preface this with Hubby doesn't hunt for sport, we consume what he harvests. Deer don't get huge around here, but the mature ones usually have antlers with 8 "points". Hubby got one last week that had TWENTY! Take a look...I swear it looks like tree limbs. You should be able to click on the photo to enlarge it...middle photo is from a back angle.
I was just thinking, about my life and how people have put me in a position of leadership my entire life. People older than me even look up to me at times, it gets sort of stressful.
This poster campaign isn’t about being overly sensitive to costume choices, it’s about perpetuati­ng prejudices and negative stereotype­s through these choices. It isn’t racist to dress up as another culture, per se. But if you do it with a mocking intent, then you’re taking it too far. All we’re asking people is to stop perpetuating those prejudices and to realize that you’re crossing a line when you strap fake bombs to your chest to portray a Middle Eastern man or if you paint your face black.
Gently heat the oils in a pot until a piece of garlic sizzles. Add the remaining garlic and chile flakes and sauté until the garlic starts to turn golden. Whisk in the soy sauce and stock and bring the mixture to a simmer.
Daniela
May God thy gold refine
Now I’m just going to get a big glass of icecold juice, an apple, my book and head out in the sun. Maybe take a nap. We’ll see. I’ll just enjoy this summer day.
The pages were crisp, like an apple,
Deep condition your hair. You should expect shedding and breakage at the line of demarcation during your transition, beginning as early as month three. At least once per month, use a quality deep-penetrating conditioner for an intense treatment. Cover using a plastic cap and sit under a hooded dryer for at least twenty to thirty minutes. Rinse out.
Make an offering of it.
On being asked whether there would be a challenge to Najib’s leadership should he fail to secure a thumping victory in the 13th General Election, Tan Sri Abdullah Ahmad opined that if a challenge is mounted against Najib, it would be from the second echelon leaders and not from his deputy, Tan Sri Muhyiddin Yassin. He then made this telling observation:
Franken and groups, including the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU), the Center for Digital Democracy and Consumer Watchdog, said voluntary guidelines won’t be enough to protect privacy.
A few things you might not know about me :
It fell absolutely perfect
Fredrick Lawrence Hunt (1887-1967), husband of Vic Sharp.
4) The settings in this book came to life. I loved the party scenes and dance scenes and traffic scenes. I felt like I was right there with Perry and Gobija as they sped around the city, getting into every bit of trouble they could.
- Fixed more than 2000 volume fluctuations
Life on other planets doesn't mean E.T. Even a simple single-cell bacteria or the equivalent of shower mold would shake perceptions about the uniqueness of life on Earth.
Insanity, to set out across the prairie on such a cold day? Not when there was a church full of people waiting for me to play for them. Not when I was excited to perform the world premier of one of the pieces I'd written in Ireland this summer.
"You can just ride in. I can't. We can't," he said, indicating his brethren sitting back on the coal car, wings folded. "We cannot cross into the city. It is forbidden."
I’m about to confess something….I watch Glee. Please don’t judge me. But in my recent viewing of Glee, well really in any viewing of Glee, you come to the realization that there are several things happening: something serious that the show addresses and something that is overly dramatic (that shouldn’t be) that the show either addresses comically or seriously. And sometimes the writers poorly write too many issues into one episode instead of spreading them out for a season (which you can actually criticize them for writing issues into plot points that seem forced in the first place, but that’s besides the point). While I’m watching this episode, I’ve come to the realization that some of the characters make a big hairy deal over some things that are just not that important. While at the same time, there is actual pain occurring in the “more” serious issue for someone else.
Today I have received a letter from the Department of Work and Pensions (DWP) regarding the universal raise of Disability Living Allowance (DLA). I receive low rate care and low rate mobility, just over £40 per week. It also reminded me that on the 26th January 2013 my DLA claim will expire! Panic time.
The on-line second-hand book shop also managed by Donald brings in a small but steady income.
. . . announces new beer concept and partnership with Austin’s own Republic Tequila. A barrel aged Imperial Black Lager – Schwarzbier is in the making to be named Señor Viejo . . .
DM *knows exactly what I'm writing* Lots of people do that you know. Eat roadkill.
Now what are those voices that people claim to hear? The first are angels and for this we read Galatians 1:8. “But though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him be accursed.” Angels do speak from heaven but beware; it is false. This is proven from 1 Timothy 4:1 that “in the latter times some shall depart from the faith giving heed to seducing spirits.” The seducing spirits are angels who left their first estate or the demons that so often opposed Jesus while on earth.
Sure, Russ and I plan, daily in fact.
If Rocky III was a slow descent into absurdity, Rocky IV is the freefall. Sylvester Stallone’s heart might have been in the right place, but his sensibilities re no where to be found. Did he not have someone nearby who could put the brakes on some of his most outlandish ideas or did he pull a George Lucas on this one?
It's weeks like this that show what the Weekly Bake-Off is really about - learning from each other and comparing results. If there is a week that you read eachother's blog posts then make it this one, I'm sure you will learn at least one thing.
To make sure, you can also check the seller’s name as well as his address. Compare that piece of information with the title and the registration of the vehicle. Verify these pieces of information as well. The vehicle identification number (VIN) should also help. Dents, scratches or loose rivets on the plate would mean that it may have been tampered. Then, check the VIN with the number on the title given to you. The Department of Motor Vehicles may also help. You can ask them to run a title history just to be on the safe side.
Today I thought I'd post a little tutorial on making your own Washi tape; it's really simple and the possibilities are endless!
Today, in celebration of Earth Day, the challenge is: Give a Hoot. We must use an owl and something recycled.
That was SO satisfying.
These the basic human needs that each and every man and woman needs. They’re not wishes, they are needs. You’ve got the power to fulfill your needs in a positive or in a damaging way.
Do you see how the cupboards actually open and then go inside the armoire? Awe-some! Now the kids don't hang on it and we don't have them sticking out in the open taking up more space that we don't have (the doors, not the kids - those are still taking up space...:). He made a pull-out shelf for the keyboard and added another shelf up top for our printer.
Probably the best pub we found was Horse Brass a traditional english pub a short cab ride out of downtown. In addition to a great selection of local brews, this quaint timber-laden bar had a good selection of internationally acclaimed brews such as Weihenstephaner and Affligem. The passionate and knowledgable staff didnt make it hard to pursuade the uninitiated to jump from local to global. We even shouted some locals a bottle of Duchesse de Bourgogne. I am ashamed to say, the West Coast IPA had worn a little thin by now.
The game is unique in that it carefully blends action-oriented combat with puzzles and strategy.
I knew I had ballooned way beyond any weight I had ever been. By now I had stopped weighing myself for years...the truth would have been too much to bear, besides I was really trying to lose and couldn't imagine that I wasn't losing and it had to be impossible that I was still gaining.
Going on twenty years now, Mr. Right was out of the country for 10 months. I happened upon a cute Christmas card that I bought and popped in the mail to him. On the cover of the card, there was pictured a snowman with blocks of black cubes falling from the sky. Inside the card, it read “Lead it Snow, Lead it Snow“. Thus began our fascination and obsession with pun cards. Not only for holidays, but we search them out for birthdays and anniversaries (yes, I already have my anniversary card safely tucked away for this year and it is a doozie), it is frightening how many we have found, bought, given……..even the kids have joined in and tried to give them to us. It has turned so weird it is almost better than finding the perfect gift. To find the elusive PUN card. Some of us have even written inside the card “found one, ha”. Such a sweet discovery. When you are at the card shop looking for a card for a soldier or a happy housewarming card and you literally stumble upon the pun. One I remember Mr. Right gave me……..outside of card a picture of a teeny tiny lawnmower……………inside of card…………”I Love you a little mower each year“. Sweet.
* 1 1/3 cup shredded Mexican blend cheese
T-shirts. when I called her I learned that her precious son, Scott had
Oh my gosh, two blog posts in one day?! Stick your head outside and check for horsemen, because I think it just might be a sign of the apocalypse!!
Without squeaky pre-flights
“Before the twister hit, I sent a last text to say ‘I love you’ to my best friend, and then the building began to come apart around me,” said the 34-year-old from Henagar.
LANDELIJKE COORDINATIESTRUCTUUR INFECTIEZIEKTENBESTRIJDING (LCI). Influenza (griep). Protocollen Infectieziekten. URL: http://www.infectieziekten.info
We fall upon our faces, trying to go;
WARNING: Contains spoilers! Please revisit my review after watching the film if you do not wish to know what happens.
Through a social network I belong to, ASW, I communicated with Joshua who runs a safari/travel outfit in Nairobi. He procured a Land Rover, retained the service and expertise of a great guide/driver and booked the various lodges I had selected. He met my husband in Kilimanjaro and drove to the lodge where Judy and I had just checked in, following our trek down the kilimanjaro mountain.
The only reason I started reading those message boards in the first place was to offer help to people planning a visit to or moving to France, so I have nobody to blame but myself. I've decided to stop reading them.
Adults and teens need booster shots so they don’t give pertussis to the babies in their lives, said CDC spokeswoman Alison Patti.
Either way, race season is here, and I love it.
to manage our thought patterns in clean order,
As far as this impacting my relationship with food; I don’t feel like it has impacted it at all really. I enjoy and indulge when I want to but I don’t make this the norm. My opinion is that you just feel better when you eat well. The example I give in my nutrition seminars is this: chocolate cake on your birthday is awesome, surrounded by your friends and family celebrating you and your life; chocolate cake every day is a means to disliking who you are.
Take all the basil and chop it up really finely. Peel the shallots and garlic and chop them up too.
It was a simple topic, but it had a tremendous impact on my life. I knew writing was what I wanted to do.
I could find a Hearing Aid company in Southern CA, but I've been going to Modesto Hearing Aid Center for 15 years, and they are wonderful Christian people, that I love and trust, so I'll be making another trip up North when the bubble is gone. This time it will be a quick trip, and I'll take the Amtrak and leave Don home to take care of Aunt Trula. Isn't life a trip.....and the beats goes on!
Ncube and the VIP officer were declared dead on the scene.
I think this card worked out well though....the images are small, so you
In a scene that would have been unthinkable just months ago, opposition leader Aung San Suu Kyi and other elected members of her National League for Democracy officially took their seats Wednesday in parliament.
a dash of sunflower oil
I know too many people who allow their jobs to be their point of individuality. Some may allow their looks to be their distinguishing factor. But what if you lost all of it? How would you identify yourself? Would you be able to focus on something or someone bigger than you or I?
He could just sit with the problem, get on about the business of solving it whilst actively seeking other solutions.
www.nolifetilmetal.com (lots of reviews, but not all of the bands are Christian. However, he does clearly identify which ones are Christian)
Everyone one, myself included, is exhausted and feeling decidedly under the weather. I’ve tried to get as much done as possible, but I’ve had company two nights this week, so I am as behind as ever…..but it was Nephew, so it was fun company. And he doesn’t mind if the dishes aren’t washed.
Oh, and Cooper was playing with some G.I Joe figurines that have all sorts of awesome costumes. He was especially intrigued with the dude wearing the antarctic looking costume, and proceeded to come into the kitchen while my Mom and I finished frosting cookies, open the freezer, and carry on a conversation with the doll, as if he was asking him if he'd prefer the freezer. We were speechless, and then busted out laughing. This boy cracks me up!
I wanna, I wanna turn back times
For those with a spirit of innocence, they will identify innocence everywhere. They may not actually say “they know not what they do,” but they will create ways for other people to recognize what they have been doing with their own words, how they have been relating to their own perceptions, how they have been identifying themselves when they label their own conclusions.
Also often titled as “Joey (1985)” but not to be confused with the German/US fantasy film by Roland Emmerich and starring Joshua Morell as 9 yo Joey and a ventriloquist dummy. This 1986 film is about Rock’n Roll and teens. Story by Ellen Hammill (who also starred), directed by Joseph Ellington.
To work them all in meant a five-mile foot journey over wild and generally snowed-up country. So the first thing we did was to plan our route; a formality, as the route never changed. All the same, we blew on our fingers and argued; and then we chose our Leader. This was not binding, for we all fancied ourselves as Leaders, and he who started the night in that position usually trailed home with a bloody nose.
come again some hot summer day
Here are some of the photos I took during my visit:
I’m not sure what to think of Tom Heckert as a drafter. He seems to get fixated on certain guys and takes them whenever he can get them, which means that he’ll get slammed a lot for reaches. That strategy can work great in Madden if you’ve scouted somebody nobody else has, but a couple of his picks are head scratchers. Coverage of the first round is here.
and everywhere that you wandered
But then again, this is just my opinion and, therefore, it carries no more weight than yours. You may disagree with everything I've said.
REPORTER: Bad news.
Fairy tales of yesterday will grow but never die,
† As is often the case with neighbors, there is a certain friendly rivalry that exists. I can’t resist relating this (possibly) apocryphal story:
I read my horoscope today, and this is what it said:
In 2003 I was living in Canberra, working hard, studying harder, and spending waaaay too much time emailing and writing old fashioned letters to Alex, the perfect-on-paper man of my dreams. One day, I found myself sitting in a Belgian Beer Cafe in Perth, with my best mate, Alison, and we plotted a plan to go to Europe together in the summer, when I finished my degree. Al and I share a love of many things, Camper shoes being one of them. European culture and history being another. I knew she would love Belgium, and Evelyne. I organised to go to Cologne to meet up with Alex, of course, and was so excited. I could barely concentrate on my exams, and was flying out the week they finished.
So I was sorting through my receipts from the UK, throwing away the things that weren't deductible and remembering how much I love museums and books and charity shops (not, not, and not deductible).
As per whether Ian’s treatment at the hands of the police was necessary….probably not…maybe it was too excessive…I certainly think so….
As important as this film may have been for Timothy Hutton (he did win an Oscar, after all), and as much as it established Robert Redford as a potential director (he won one, too), the real revelation here is Mary Tyler Moore. This is a woman who had, for years, made people laugh on television. She was (and presumably still is) a fabulous comedienne with great timing. And here, she plays so much against type and does it so flawlessly, that I wonder why she didn’t do more serious dramatic work.
Thankfully this is a once in a lifetime experience.
Cut elastic to whatever waist size you need. I used 18" for Naomie who has just gone into age 6-9months. Stitch the two ends of elastic together to make a tube. Find the 4 quarters on the elastic tube and mark each with a pin.
I got up and reached into my wardrobe for my pink bathing robe. I needed to take a long bath to clear my mind. But right before I entered the bathroom, the doorbell rang.
If you are a parent who experienced a not so great childhood, BE AWARE. Don't pass on that to your own children. It's simple really, if it feels yucky, if what you do causes pain for you or your child, it probably isn't a good thing to do and you should stop doing it. If you get stuck, get advice to do better, accept that you've done something wrong, apologize for it and don't do it again. That's a big part of the equation, don't do it again!
Well, this did happen last May. Hubby and I together with two other couples headed off for the weekend to the Lake District with the intention of climbing England’s highest mountain. No mean feat for someone who is allergic to any sort of exercise!
I’ve always been a mythology nut. I have a deep respect for the concept of a mythology in that it is a representation of a society and its vision of what the world and life means. Each culture has a unique way of explaining how life works and what life and all its complexities really mean. But even then one can identify the similarities, the sharing of myths among cultures through trade and time.
OK, so for the time being I have changed the wedding colors from black-white-red to black-white-Tiffany blue. The problem is, I can't think of any flowers that will work well with that color scheme, so I'll probably end up switching back to red. Grr, lol.
Two reasons. First, for underletting. The standard late 19th century way of mashing was mash, underlet, sparge. Underletting, or introducing hot water from the bottom of the tun, was a way of doing a simple step mash. After underletting the rakes made a couple of revolutions to mix the hot water thoroughly into the mash. Second, to loosen a stuck mash.
Apparently not. There are exceptions. One of them is this:
3: How can I help them fulfil their needs at a higher level? For instance with your children, they NEED to feel significant, ignoring them or making them feel small and insignificant will not work. Give them some responsibility, acknowledge them and their opinions, PRAISE them!
2 Place butter in large microwave-safe bowl. Microwave at MEDIUM (50%) 2 to 2-1/2 minutes or until melted. Stir in sugar and vanilla. Add eggs, one at a time, beating well with spoon after each addition. Add cocoa; beat until well blended. Add flour, baking powder and salt; beat well. Stir in nuts, if desired. Pour batter into prepared pan.
Of course, I felt personally sorry for those students who were unlucky to have their names drawn out. They looked real upset too. But while their sad and angry faces lingered in the corner of my eye throughout the rest of the class, I was real impressed by the work the class as whole did. It was exciting to finally see some vigorous mathematic exercises in place.
“What I said.”
And I leave them with this warning; "If there is any fooling around, the person that started it will be sleeping in HRH's room. With the glass."
I just love the opening fanfare for this track. It’s almost of a stature that it could be used as an Olympic Flame fanfare. The latter half of the cue features cimbalom, one of my favourite instruments.
More than 80 properties have already been hit by droughts, with a more than
Some days if it was too hot or too cold, Pup was fine hanging out in the park, saying hello to his horses and generally making friends with one and all.
It was time to move on though. I was stagnating. I didn’t know how to help others grow let alone myself. To continue to grow I need to look deep within myself. That in itself will be a monumental task. But I believe it will be well worth the effort. No self-aggrandizing, just searching for the best person I can truly be.
This is the area I've tried to mostly plant native plants in. Some of the plants I thought were native when I bought them aren't, but so far, I am keeping them there to see how I like them. In a month or so, a number of the plants will be much taller than what they are now, and much less dirt will be showing.
Contributors
If she did not live across the country, we would be real life friends for sure!!!
In these times of economic trouble, it’s hard to justify the expense of space travel. It costs millions to send people into space, but that doesn’t sound so bad when you expect billions in profits. And adding all those extra resources to the global economy could end this recession for good.
And, on the potty seat.
- Preheat the oven to gas 4/180C. Grease and line a 2lb loaf tin. Cream together the butter and sugar until light and fluffy. Add the eggs, marmalade and flour and continue beating until well combined. Fold through the apricots and spoon into the prepared tin. Bake for around 40-50 minutes. I recall thinking that 35 minutes would be enough for this rather shallow loaf cake, but mine took about 50. Remove from the tin and leave to cool on a wire rack.
The Craft Beer Co works not only because of the range of beers available but because it meets the tastes and sates the beery appetites of an ever evolving beer market filled with drinkers who want their next beer to be their best beer and who aren't afraid to stretch their beer horizons.
John told Jenny that he had been absolutely sure that she would hate this book with its psychological dimension and poetic prose, since what she likes best is a good clear story. Jenny grinned and agreed that that last is true, but she still really liked this book.
4. Where's the Man
Duane Forrester: Video on Establishing Authority in Bing
One time he got lost, it was the scariest saddest thing!
Is aflame with your glory,
Local bookstores: 21
Anyway, this book. Dawkins doesn't just argue his points, he demolishes any opposition step by step, systematically and comprehensively. He is a very good science writer, with the ability to lead the reader through some difficult concepts. He's entertaining as well. The book covers a wide range of topics from geology - the dating of rocks (which also dates the fossils in them and proves the earth is far older than the 10,000 years Creationists give it); embryology - how an organism grows from a single cell to a complex creature in just a few months; plate tectonics - explains why all marsupials are found in Australia and nowhere else; microbiology - experiments with generations of bacteria showing evolution happening before our very eyes.
The vaccine safety debate is murked up with money and crossed purposes. Adverse reactions do happen, and the doctors know it. We had to sign a lot of papers acknowledging that reality when Billy had Transverse Myelitis. We are not the only ones.
Picross 3D
Traditional Korean instruments: The royal family listens to a performance of whatever these are:
I have been meaning to do this post for a couple of months now because it's a topic that I have some uncertainty over along with personal experience. I love books and a gift card for me to buy books is one of the best gifts that I could get. And I give certain readers in my family gift cards too because then they can buy books on their own. However, actually buying a book for someone else can be hit or miss. I am getting my dad a book but I know he likes the series/author, is collecting the books in paperback to fit on his shelf and he promised not to buy that specific book. But there is no surprise in the gift because of that. There are pitfalls to buying books as presents and I'm going to talk about them.
I instagram’d it and made it all crazy, but I love it.
What is it about beach vacations that are so attractive?
Fleur
3. Delegate Your Work – Yes, delegation = development. Many leaders shy away from delegating some of their work, as they feel like they are “dumping” on team members or they lack time to train team members. Adopt the 10-80-10 rule. Spend the first 10% of your time on casting the vision, setting the expectations and encouraging the team member. The next 80% of time, the team member does the work. The last 10% of time, spend reviewing the team member’s work and put your finishing touches on the task or project.
Any of you who read my blog have heard this all before. Forgetting to brush my hair, going to a meeting with a cereal bar stuck to my sleeve – nothing new. But what I saw that day was a new low in my personal grooming, which is why I feel the abnormal need to tell you all about it.
What I want to say is that I think the reactions were planned to be exaggerated this time by some Middle Eastern regimes and are not mere public reaction.
Eden has a variety of accessories where Ethan only has one of everything. Different personalities need different spaces!
When in the right mood (and with the possibility of closing the window), it was amusing, but sometimes, you just want to sleep. This video is pretty tame – tail end of something suspicious – but just keep in mind this is 7:30 AM on a typical Sunday morning and a ruckus has been going on all night!
-Add the rice and cook covered on medium flame until the water evaporates and rice is cooked.Add the fried cashews on top.
- The Smoothie
“Whaddya mean my people?” Marley Wright’s silvery-blue eyes flashed back, a little insulted. He bent over and brushed the sand out of his greasy black hair with rapid strokes of his hands.
One the the advantages of living in a jungle within a city state is I got visited by all sorts of rare animals .
We are their parents because we are the only ones that could do this. Respond to their cries and then their questions; hold their limbs, fragile still but forming into the bones that will carry them, carry them far and wide, carry them well.
Talk about cheap travel! I can leave any time, no back pack or rollie required and the shortest visit leaves me renewed, refreshed and ready to carry on. No dis-respect to my hubby or my neighbors, or the guy who sits next to me at Starbucks on Saturday morning and wants to CHAT, but, really, I’ve heard your stories before – more than once – and they aren’t getting any better. Never wanting to appear rude or disinterested, I’ve found that if I just smile and nod, nobody knows I’m trippin’, but my mind has taken off for higher ground. Surely, I’m not alone here. I’m thinking some days Bermuda might be a very crowded little island. I know my husband is doing to the same thing, only maybe he’s on Barbados.
programs directly on the screen. Definitely ranking as favorites in the
When you are with someone you like, you stop seeing them as a sales person. You feel like they are looking out for your best interests without digging around for their commission.
I'm really glad I finally got a chance to do this cookie project! It took a long time, from beginning to end, but it was really fun and acted as a great artistic outlet. Wouldn't these be perfect for a birthday party or shower?
Call them instead of tweet them.
What? It's true. At some point or another you're going to have to do it. Whether it's in school, where you've just been told you have to write 10 pages about something you couldn't care less about (and can't find enough information about to fill more than 5 pages about), or in the grown-up world where occasionally you just need to fill a silence or move a conversation forward. I'm proud to say that my son, a mere seven years old, and only in the 2nd grade, is well on his way to becoming a champion BS-er. Come on, everyone remembers writing papers or paragraphs like this at least ten times in the course or their education:
Note that the underlined wording does not refer to all goods/services in a class, but in effect to all pre-approved terms in a listing such as Euroace. It looks then that this is a case of the CP2 team assembling all pre-approved goods/services in a class to produce a “class scope” list of most, but probably not all, goods/services in the class, which can be accepted under CTMIR Rule 2 and UK TMR Rule 8 (or whatever replaces them when the Commission’s work is done). The term “class scope” is a potential problem in that it gives a sense of full class content, whereas it actually seems intended to contain those goods/services in a class which have, to date, been approved. “Approved class terms” is not exactly felicitous but something along those lines will need to be developed to avoid any implication of full class cover. However if this understanding does reflect CP2’s expected outcome, it looks positive as a separation between what a class covers in the abstract and a listing of pre-approved goods/services in the class which can be used in any EU trade mark application. There will, I am sure, be within that a hope that the taxonomy approach to pre-approval will lead to some sort of “class-heading Mark II” for each of the 45 classes covering all goods/services in each class. I do not see that as possible but, if the appetite is still there to let businesses get registration rights for something close to all goods/services in a class, this could work. What that seems to suggest is:
Chicago.
"Shush."
Here I left it plain. I used the masked technique to add the stamped text. I also like this result!
The volume of cars passing through the service road has increased tremendously. The higher toll fees could be a factor; a lot of those clogging the service road are delivery trucks and vans desperately trying to cut costs. Another consideration is that most of our area has recently been converted into a commercial/residential zone. Our subdivision used to be one of the smaller residential pockets in a sea of factories; now the factories are shutting down and new housing projects are being put up. There are simply more people now, and the jeepneys — whose drivers are assaulted by rising gas and food prices — are making the most of this demographic shift.
Eventually they backed down. My brother offered up another classical selection, one that failed to register in my brain because I was still steaming over the Yesterday battle.
I really enjoyed Laneige's skin care, especially the water bank series and the perfect renew series. The Perfect Renew series prevents premature series and while I was using it, I think it did a really good job keeping fine lines out my skin.
The Automattic Worldwide WP 5k is set for April 29, but can be done any time during this upcoming week, between April 23rd and the 29th, from any place in the world. I am truly intrigued by this one as they motivated workers in their web community from 79 cities and 24 countries to run/walk a 5k on the same day last year!
Wednesday, voted against the Government twice on the Legal Aid etc Bill, on amendments restoring the right of appellants against official decisions about entitlement to welfare benefits to legal aid in complex cases both at the First-Tier Tribunal and on appeals against the decisions in the First Tier Tribunal The argument was very one-sided, not a single member apart from the Minister supporting the Government's case, I have already explained that although I am a firm supporter of the Government's intention to eliminate the deficit, I don't agree that we should make the poor and vulnerable share the burden, when there is plenty of scope for taxing the rich, and in the case of the NHS, taxing bad habits like drinking, smoking and eating harmful substances like sugar and fats.
Here is the funny thing I learned when I began to dis-entangle from my Evangelical Hero Complex: I’m pretty sure that there aren’t actually any big things for God. There are only small things being done, over and over, with great love, as Mother Theresa said. With great faith. With great obedience. With great joy or suffering or wrestling or forgiving on a daily completely non-sexy basis. And grace covers all of it and God makes something beautiful out of our dust.
2. Tomas Alfredson, Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy – This Swede burst onto the international scene a few years back with the excellent vampire film Let the Right One In. The coldness of that film carries into Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy. He crafts his visuals with the precision of jeweler and allows an incredible cast of actors to do what they do best.
OK.
Gurlee Girl clear stamp.
I am your fear
He had slept fitfully on the cold metal floor of his cell, but now he was too hungry and thirsty to sleep. His throat was so parched that he wouldn’t have been able to talk even if he had somebody to talk to. His muscles were cramped from sitting in the same position for too long, but he didn’t have the energy to move at all. He was becoming more convinced all the time that he was going to die in this cell. Maybe someone would remember he was there when his corpse started to stink? Maybe not. In the end, it would have been better to die in that valley after all.
“I like to consider myself a set collector and Score is quite a set to build. I bought and bought until I amassed quite a number of cards and I really liked the parallel sets within Score (Scorecard, Gold Zone, Red Zone, End Zone, Artist’s Proof) and, of course, the insert sets as well (Hot Rookies, Franchise, etc.). I don’t know why I really liked them because they’re not really that different from the base set. Now, in 2007 I discovered Select and from there on out I was hooked. Something about the foil and some of the color variations really caught my eye. I still tried to build the main sets of Score and Select but now my focus was primarily on the parallels and inserts. I really didnt focus on the autos as much then, coming one per box made it kind of hard to build a collection.
The gravity
Dinner was at Hogsbreath Cafe and we had a lovely steak meal followed by the most ginormous dessert you could imagine! Even between the three of us we couldn't get it finished, this thing was like a huge fish bowl! Here is a pic of the girls before we demolished it.
the day after, i e-mailed my apology, which was a little too late. she had removed all connections to me. and naturally did not respond to my sorry.
2 Cans Chicken Stock
The Watchmen first came into existence in the late 1700′s, when the Dutch ruled New York City. Their job was little more than patrolling the streets at night, looking for any possible disturbances, but mostly avoiding them. They would also call out the hours of the night, with such inane declarations as, “By the grace of God, two o’clock in peace.” Or, “By the grace of God, four o’clock and a cold, raw morning.”
He started the firm in the 1970s in the garage of parents Paul and Clara. Co-founder Steve Wozniak said he will "miss him as much as everyone".
and we found one that we both agreed we were in LOVE with...
It has long been a dream of mine to make my own leather baby shoes. They're much better for little ones learning to walk, and they're just so adorable! I've tried the fabric kind, and while I like them, they just don't have the same look. And since store-bought versions can easily cost $18-30 a pair (and up!), purchasing them seemed less than feasible.
So when Uncle Virgil summoned Lester DooLittle to come over and build a modern and proper hencoop--his request was met with more than a bit of trepidation on Lester's part--"ain't no way I'm a comin' over there with that there killer beast a runnin' loose!" he adamantly declared ... well Virgil assured Lester that he would straightaway put the rooster in a secure location so he could safely come over and begin construction ... confident that Uncle Virgil would do exactly as he had said, Lester gathered his carpenterin' tools and headed over to Virgil's place ... in the meantime Uncle Virgil had chased that rooster all around the yard trying to catch him, but couldn't even get within arm's reach of the agile, quick-witted cackler ... so when it finally ran through the open door of an abandoned panel truck hidden behind some bushes near the fence, Virgil quickly slammed that door shut thus entrapping the speedy and elusive bird inside, at least Lester DooLittle should now remain unscathed when he entered the property ... no sooner had Virgil walked out of sight than Lester pulled up in front of the gate ... the wide-eyed boy slowly slid out of the still running truck and began nervously looking all around for any sign of Virgil's rooster ... seeing no rooster and satisfied that he was in no eminent danger, Lester shut off the truck's engine, grabbed his tool belt, entered the gate and began gingerly walking toward Uncle Virgil who was now standing near the spot where he wanted the new henhouse to be built ... Lester had made it about half way between the front gate and Virgil's front porch when he heard the loudest, most frightening and furiously angry sound seemingly right next to him that he had ever heard in his entire wretched life sending icy shivers straight up his back "kukukukukukuk cock-a-doodle-doo! ... kukukukukukukuk cock-a-doodle-dooooooooooo!!" ... Lester was certain that ol' rooster was comin' for him and frantically cried out "you was supposed to put that rooster someplace where it couldn't hurt nobody old man!" ... Lester DooLittle was so scared he didn't know whether to run like a scalded jackrabbit or just fall over stone-cold dead right there on the spot, but his feet had already made the executive decision to run to the nearest haven of safety--that junked panel truck sitting right there smack dab in the middle of those bushes ... as Lester jerked open the door, dived into the back of that rusty junker and slammed the door shut behind him, amidst his own screams of agony he thought he could hear Uncle Virgil Hunnicutt's reply "I did put him where he couldn't get to you Lester ... he's inside that old panel truck there in the bushes!"
Kylie xx
We both had a good laugh.
Debord wrote this in 1956 and it has been quoted by psychogeographers every since as its defining statement. What it means is that the drift (usually taken as the same thing as psychogeography, though it wasn’t for Debord) is a political act that releases you, even if only temporarily, from all forms of economic productivity and consumption. Sixty years later we take extensive leisure time for granted and the drift is evoked as a value free term for personal advancement by artists, app-developers and all other scum that wants to make it in the so-called creative industries. The drift is not a walk that is not from A to B, it’s a way of life that feeds into the psychogeographical restructuring of the city as a platform of political struggle. Creating a village on the footsteps of the stock-exchange is psychogeographic, reading Walter Benjamin in a Starbucks is
I loved watching Kirk’s character evolve as the story progressed. At first, Kirk is nothing but a self-centered, egotistical jerk, so I actually wondered if I would be able to eventually warm up to his character. I should have trusted Mr. Alders, because as the book continues, Kirk’s character starts to change from someone who doesn’t care about anyone but himself, to a loving, man that becomes determined to use his power and wealth to help others. By the end of the novel, Kirk had become a character that I came to like and even admire.
8) Corn Flour - 3 teaspoon
POSTLIFE was recoded into the following categories:
vampirizing, terrorizing, martyrizing, killing and so on their victims (All Life).
Catherine didn’t plan on getting involved in the murder case but she can’t help it. It is her reporter instincts kicking in. She calls on help from her friend, Anthony, a forensic psychiatrist.
A-Maying we sing awakened Earth!
I can definitely see me using this cartridge in my fabric-crafting endeavors, for things like making bias tape, doing applique, or temporarily holding hems in place until I can stitch - rather than pinning!
So, earlier in the week, I was caught up on design team work, and got to play along with some challenges. Just for fun. As mentioned before, I don't get to do that too often, so I'm always happy when I do. Here is the card I created.
I do think there is some skill in terms of assessing the board to where triple words, double word scores are and working towards those spots but you got to play the letters you are dealt with and hope that no one puts others in your way.
Here we have proof that the British Establishment is run from top to bottom with traitorous scum, what will prosecute retired British soldiers at the same time as sending them to their deaths in Afghanistan and Iraq.
Take a deep breath, pause for thirty seconds while contemplating the models of business for mainstream publishing and the various opportunities and avenues for authors looking to self-publish their book. Consider how large publishers operate and market books and consider, too, how precious shelf space is to a small independent press and a self-published author even using the most professional services they can hire.
Illinois fields the top male in the nation (probably for a few years to come!) in Sophomore Lukas Verzbicas as well as some of the top boys teams in the nation in York and Naperville Neuqua Valley. York lost 2 stars in Steve Sulkin (9:01) and Jordan Herbert (9:04) and Neuqua lost Foot Locker All-American Danny Pawola but as most perennial powerhouses they have rebuilt and both should have strong showings at the IL state meet and Nike Cross nationals.
But that's because they are. We all know it's a marketing stunt, but it doesn't break any rules. The rules prohibit competitive beer branding around the stadium. There was no branding. End of.
I was SO HAPPY to finally hear that horn blow.
Fletcher seeks to break up play and then passes simply and effectively, having a huge influence on the Manchester United style of play; allowing players like Wayne Rooney, Nani and Ryan Giggs to break with devastating effect.
A new format of four candidates is needed. The moderator asks a question and the candidates, in turn, answer them. Then they rotate for the next question, with the guy who answered first answering last and everyone else moving up.
“Please sheath your finger and moderate your tone of voice!” I demanded in a firm whisper.
Preschool Literacy
Even harder yet is trying to pass said contrived retrospected rock music off as the music of a generation. It's just not possible, or true. RENT is one guy's idea of what rock music from a brief geographical and historical period was like. The music of a generation is defined by variation, by themes, by adaptations, by deviations. It cant be defined by one guy writing some pretty shitty pseudo-operatic non-melodic rock music about some friends of his who got the HIV.
Fitness and Weight Loss Kit
I turned 32 the first weekend in March, and Zac turns 35 this weekend. I've wanted new garden beds since we put last year's garden to sleep, but I wasn't going to ask Zac for that because he just had shoulder surgery in February. But, he remembered, and built it with one arm in a sling. :) Here's my new HUGE garden bed.
The winner will be drawn by me (Liz) after 6pm on Thursday the 31st of May, using the random list generator at www.random.org and announced later on the same evening.
Last, I added some little sticker crystal stars in the sky. They started out clear, but that was too bright so I toned them down with the same V09 that I airbrushed the sky with. I wish the pumpkin were a little bigger so the curve isn't getting in the way of a good picture. Oh well, my son will love his pumpkin. Have a Happy Halloween, All Saint's Day, and Día De Los Muertos!
The best sequences, visually, take place in the Viking's headquarters, a large cave where Bava's colored gels run wild. The centerpiece of the set is the giant gnarled tree from Hercules in the Haunted World, which looks magnificent in this new context.
SUMMARY: Rileigh Martin would love to believe that adrenaline had given her the uncanny courage and strength to fend off three muggers. But it doesn't explain her dreams of 15th-century Japan, the incredible fighting skills she suddenly possesses, or the strange voice giving her battle tips and danger warnings.
When you’re dealt with the blow your entire world caves in on you. The next phase is Booze; you find yourself so upset that you drown your sorrows and drink to try and forget often crying into your beer or wine or stronger. After this stage you begin Reflection phase; what did I do wrong? We had such good times together, whose fault was it? During this phase you usually find yourself trying to make another go of things, contacting the person who broke up with you to ask them “Why” this happened, and if there is any chance you could work it out. Following this phase after not receiving the response that you have longed for you enter into Anger phase which usually coincides with Revenge (if you’re feeling so angry to the point of revenge). Anger comes when you go into denial; you try to tell yourself and everybody else around you that you hate that person. Love and Hate are very close together. And so from this you decide to tell that person how angry you are by sending them poison-pen letters, telling stories about them, phoning them up drunk off your face and insulting them. You may then embark on revenge which, like I mentioned in yesterday’s post, is immensely damaging. You want them to feel your pain, you want them to be hurting so bad for rejecting you. Because that is how you feel: Rejected. After anger phase your enter as second phase of denial whereupon you think that you’re ready to move on and thus pick up anyone you can in order to try and prove to yourself that the other person is finally out of your head; they may very well be, but they’re not out of your heart. This is the phase where you’re on the rebound. (Of course some rebounders will merely sleep with whomever they can find, however some may strike up a relationship and cause the bounce off effect of breaking another’s heart.) You will then make further renegotiation attempts with your ex which once more fail, and so you then realise it is just not going to work no matter what you try. You have already alienated them when in anger phase, so you’ve hurt them so much that they start to think to themselves “Well I’m glad I didn’t stay with them, if that is what they’re really like.” Next phase is Self Destruct. This phase is where you behave completely out of character and go to extreme lengths to punish yourself; you may find yourself sleeping around just to feel something, deliberately try and get into fights with other people, alienate your friends, anything that would hurt you. Finally, after everything comes to a head you’re on the road to recovery; the Healing phase. In the healing phase you reflect on what you have done and that after all of that wasted effort it truly is time to have a bit of R & R and rediscover yourself. Taking some time out, you might have a holiday, or just go and stay with family for a while, have a change of scenery; you may even find yourself moving somewhere new and starting afresh. As you become more positive about yourself and you find that you have near enough forgotten all of those mixed up feelings for that other person, that they don’t pop into your head on a daily basis, maybe even look back and be glad that it was over in the first place. You find new focuses, new circles, and any reflection you do is with a tut and a shake of your head saying to yourself “What was I thinking?” That single time that you enjoy, until the next time you start thinking that you’re ready for another relationship, but this time not with the same enthusiasm for true love as you had before. You develop a ‘see how it goes’ attitude, you’re actually now quite cynical as to whether you can really love someone like that again. You have become, for a better word: Grumpy.
* The incredible “Red Sky, Black Death” book launch party Mike and Colleen threw for me, in which Colleen decorated the place with dramatic red banners, and Mike dressed up in a Russian military uniform and made buckwheat blini to order. Even my Russian friends said his Russian feast was not only magnificent, but absolutely authentic. (Do you have friends who would spend a whole day in the kitchen creating a masterpiece for you on their one day off? If not, you should get some.)
Sapphire post-86 Fiesta plates and tabbed platter - Homer Laughlin China
Dougald Pippard waited nine years for this reunion. He hated that she left and would teach her a lesson. Make her fall in love then leave but there was still passion there and he will be blindsided.
Stuff that ignores our rights and our Constitution.
The American Federation of Teachers and National Education Association have donated about $25,000 each to the effort. The bulk of the rest of the donations have come from one-time gifts provided through the Save Our Schools website. Conference organizers estimated that they’d raised over $125,000. After this weekend, they will have to begin fundraising efforts anew to keep their work going.
But the star of the night was dessert:
I found an article that will be helpful for you, as it outlines step by step what you need to focus on while you are drifting off to sleep or meditating.
Do you think the Tories know what they have done with this silly idea?
Sassy (Fully Fledged Member of Hermits United)
Are you watching a friend engaging in behaviors that you know will destroy their career, their marriage, their ministry?
I don’t remember for what B was thankful.
Then We'll Rise
Billboards put up after 1979 near arterial roadways and parks are generally illegal.
Accessories: Victoria Crochet (ribbon), Organdy from SAB bundle, Pearls, Vintage Trinkets and Framelits Labels Collection Die, Eyelet Border Punch, Stampin' Dimensionals and Champagne Mist Shimmer Pain (mixed with alcohol and misted)
That said, I have watched Letterman’s CBS show perhaps twice as well. While I love the magic of the old Ed Sullivan theatre, I feel like Letterman has filed most of his edges off in order to compete with Leno….replacing spontaneity with finery and glitz. And it seems like he’s been stuck in a rut for the last couple of decades. I’m sorry…he’s still doing “Top Ten Lists”? He does that for thirty years and people still watch that? It seems to me his ratings woes stem from a lack of invention rather than the problem people usually talk about (his famously acid demeanor).
The More You Know: There have been other recent stories about children of mixed couples coming out with a variety of skin colors. Below, Cornel and Carla Nurse with who they call their "Rainbow Children" - Jermaine, who looks, well, mixed; Tanisha, who looks "Afro-Caribbean"; and Jayden, who has blonde hair and blue eyes:
Universal Studios 10k - 12/13/09 - 56:36
